
 AP880911-0016 
AP-NR-09-11-88 0423EDT
r i BC-HurricaneGilbert     09-11 0339
BC-Hurricane Gilbert,0348
Hurricane Gilbert Heads Toward Dominican Coast
By RUDDY GONZALEZ
Associated Press Writer
SANTO DOMINGO, Dominican Republic (AP) 

   Hurricane Gilbert swept
toward the Dominican Republic Sunday, and the Civil Defense alerted
its heavily populated south coast to prepare for high winds, heavy
rains and high seas.
   The storm was approaching from the southeast with sustained
winds of 75 mph gusting to 92 mph.
   ``There is no need for alarm,'' Civil Defense Director Eugenio
Cabral said in a television alert shortly before midnight Saturday.
   Cabral said residents of the province of Barahona should closely
follow Gilbert's movement. An estimated 100,000 people live in the
province, including 70,000 in the city of Barahona, about 125 miles
west of Santo Domingo.
   Tropical Storm Gilbert formed in the eastern Caribbean and
strengthened into a hurricane Saturday night. The National
Hurricane Center in Miami reported its position at 2 a.m. Sunday at
latitude 16.1 north, longitude 67.5 west, about 140 miles south of
Ponce, Puerto Rico, and 200 miles southeast of Santo Domingo.
   The National Weather Service in San Juan, Puerto Rico, said
Gilbert was moving westward at 15 mph with a ``broad area of
cloudiness and heavy weather'' rotating around the center of the
storm.
   The weather service issued a flash flood watch for Puerto Rico
and the Virgin Islands until at least 6 p.m. Sunday.
   Strong winds associated with the Gilbert brought coastal
flooding, strong southeast winds and up to 12 feet feet to Puerto
Rico's south coast. There were no reports of casualties.
   San Juan, on the north coast, had heavy rains and gusts
Saturday, but they subsided during the night.
   On Saturday, Hurricane Florence was downgraded to a tropical
storm and its remnants pushed inland from the U.S. Gulf Coast.
Residents returned home, happy to find little damage from 80 mph
winds and sheets of rain.
   Florence, the sixth named storm of the 1988 Atlantic storm
season, was the second hurricane. The first, Debby, reached minimal
hurricane strength briefly before hitting the Mexican coast last
month.



 AP880912-0095 
AP-NR-09-12-88 1300EDT
u i PM-HurricaneGilbert 5thLd-Writethru a0539 09-12 0829
PM-Hurricane Gilbert, 5th Ld - Writethru, a0539,0851
Gilbert Reaches Jamaican Capital With 110 Mph Winds
Eds: LEADS 10 grafs with hurricane reaching Kingston with 110 mph
winds, details, quotes. Picks up graf 3 pvs, `Most Jamaicans ...'
DELETES graf 12 pvs, `Storm warnings ...' as outdated.
By LLOYD WILLIAMS
Associated Press Writer
KINGSTON, Jamaica (AP) 

   Hurricane Gilbert, packing 110 mph
winds and torrential rain, moved over this capital city today after
skirting Puerto Rico, Haiti and the Dominican Republic.
   There were no immediate reports of casualties. Telephone
communications were affected.
   ``Right now it's actually moving over Jamaica,'' said Bob
Sheets, director of the National Hurricane Center in Miami. ``We've
already had reports of 110 mph winds on the eastern tip.
   ``It looks like the eye is going to move lengthwise across that
island, and they're going to bear the full brunt of this powerful
hurricane,'' Sheets said.
   Forecasters say Gilbert was expected to lash Jamaica throughout
the day and was on track to later strike the Cayman Islands, a
small British dependency northwest of Jamaica.
   Meanwhile, Havana Radio reported today that 25,000 people were
evacuated from Guantanamo Province on Cuba's southeastern coast as
strong winds fanning out from Gilbert began brushing the island.
   All Jamaica-bound flights were canceled at Miami International
Airport, while flights from Grand Cayman, the main island of the
three-island chain, arrived packed with frightened travelers.
   ``People were running around in the main lobby of our hotel (on
Grand Cayman) like chickens with their heads cut off,'' said one
vacationer who was returning home to California through Miami.
   Hurricane warnings were posted for the Cayman Islands, Cuba and
Haiti. Warnings were discontinued for the Dominican Republic.
   ``All interests in the Western Caribbean should continue to
monitor the progress of this dangerous hurricane,'' the service
said, adding, ``Little change in strength is expected for the next
several hours as the hurricane moves westward over Jamaica.''
   The Associated Press' Caribbean headquarters in San Juan, Puerto
Rico, was unable to get phone calls through to Kingston, where high
winds and heavy rain preceding the storm drenched the capital
overnight, toppling trees, causing local flooding and littering
streets with branches.
   Most Jamaicans stayed home, boarding up windows in preparation
for the hurricane. Some companies broadcast appeals for technicians
and electricians to report to work.
   The weather bureau predicted Gilbert's center, 140 miles
southeast of Kingston before dawn, would pass south of Kingston and
hit the southern parish of Clarendon.
   Flash flood warnings were issued for the parishes of Portland on
the northeast and St. Mary on the north. The north coast tourist
region from Montego Bay on the west and Ocho Rios on the east, far
from the southern impact zone and separated by mountains, was
expected only to receive heavy rain.
   Officials urged residents in the higher risk areas along the
south coast to seek higher ground.
   ``It's certainly one of the larger systems we've seen in the
Caribbean for a long time,'' said Hal Gerrish, forecaster at the
National Hurricane Center.
   Forecasters at the center said the eye of Gilbert was 140 miles
southeast of Kingston at dawn today. Maximum sustained winds were
near 110 mph, with tropical-storm force winds extending up to 250
miles to the north and 100 miles to the south.
   Prime Minister Edward Seaga of Jamaica alerted all government
agencies, saying Sunday night: ``Hurricane Gilbert appears to be a
real threat and everyone should follow the instructions and
hurricane precautions issued by the Office of Disaster Preparedness
in order to minimize the danger.''
   Forecasters said the hurricane had been gaining strength as it
passed over the ocean after it dumped 5 to 10 inches of rain on the
Dominican Republic and Haiti, which share the island of Hispaniola.
   ``We should know within about 72 hours whether it's going to be
a major threat to the United States,'' said Martin Nelson, another
meteorologist at the center. ``It's moving at about 17 mph to the
west and normally hurricanes take a northward turn after they pass
central Cuba.''
   Cuba's official Prensa Latina news agency said a state of alert
was declared at midday in the Cuban provinces of Guantanamo,
Holguin, Santiago de Cuba and Granma.
   In the report from Havana received in Mexico City, Prensa Latina
said civil defense officials were broadcasting bulletins on
national radio and television recommending emergency measures and
providing information on the storm.
   Heavy rain and stiff winds downed power lines and caused
flooding in the Dominican Republic on Sunday night as the
hurricane's center passed just south of the Barahona peninsula,
then less than 100 miles from neighboring Haiti.
   The storm ripped the roofs off houses and flooded coastal areas
of southwestern Puerto Rico after reaching hurricane strength off
the island's southeast Saturday night.
   Flights were canceled Sunday in the Dominican Republic, where
civil defense director Eugenio Cabral reported some flooding in
parts of the capital of Santo Domingo and power outages there and
in other southern areas.



 AP880912-0137 
AP-NR-09-12-88 1555EDT
u i AM-HurricaneGilbert Bjt   09-12 0681
AM-Hurricane Gilbert, Bjt,0702
Hurricane Hits Jamaica With 115 mph Winds; Communications
Disrupted
By LLOYD WILLIAMS
Associated Press Writer
KINGSTON, Jamaica (AP) 

   Hurricane Gilbert slammed into Kingston
on Monday with torrential rains and 115 mph winds that ripped roofs
off homes and buildings, uprooted trees and downed power lines.
   No serious injuries were immediately reported in the city of
750,000 people, which was hit by the full force of the hurricane
around noon.
   For half an hour, the hurricane lashed the city, tearing
branches from trees, blowing down fences and whipping paper through
the air.
   The National Weather Service reported heavy damage to Kingston's
airport and aircraft parked on its fields.
   The first shock let up as the eye of the storm moved across the
city. Skies brightened, the winds died down and people waited for
an hour before the second blow of the hurricane arrived.
   All Jamaica-bound flights were canceled at Miami International
Airport.
   Flights from the Cayman Islands, reportedly next in the path of
the hurricane, arrived in Miami packed with travelers cutting short
their vacations. ``People were running around in the main lobby of
our hotel (on Grand Cayman Island) like chickens with their heads
cut off,'' said one man.
   A National Weather Service report said the hurricane was moving
west at 17 mph with maximum sustained winds of 115 mph. It said
Jamaica would receive up to 10 inches of rain that would cause
flash floods and mud slides.
   ``Right now it's actually moving over Jamaica,'' said Bob
Sheets, director of the National Hurricane Center in Miami.
   ``It looks like the eye is going to move lengthwise across that
island, and they're going to bear the full brunt of this powerful
hurricane,'' he said.
   Gilbert reached Jamaica after skirting southern Puerto Rico,
Haiti and the Dominican Republic. Hurricane warnings were issued
Monday for the south coast of Cuba east of Camaguey, the Cayman
Islands, and Haiti, while warnings were discontinued for the
Dominican Republic.
   High winds and heavy rain preceding the storm drenched Kingston
overnight, toppling trees, causing local flooding and littering
streets with branches.
   Most of Jamaica's 2.3 million people stayed home, boarding up
windows in preparation for the hurricane.
   The popular north coast resort area, on the other side of the
mountains, was expected to receive heavy rain but not as much
damage from the hurricane as the south coast, where officials urged
residents to seek higher ground.
   Havana Radio, meanwhile, reported Monday that 25,000 people were
evacuated from coastal areas in Guantanamo Province on the nation's
southeastern coast as Gilbert's winds and rain began to brush the
island.
   In Washington, the Navy reported its bases at Guantanamo Bay,
Cuba, and Roosevelt Roads, Puerto Rico, had taken various
precautionary steps but appeared to be safe from the brunt of the
hurricane.
   Lt. Ken Ross, a spokesman, said the Navy station at Guantanamo
reported that as of 2:30 p.m. EDT, the brunt of the storm appeared
to be passing southeastern Cuba. ``They have reported maximum winds
of 25 knots and gusts up to 50 knots,'' said Ross. ``But there are
no reports of injuries or damage.''
   The spokesman said earlier in the day, Guantanamo had moved to
``Condition Two,'' meaning electrical power usage was cut back to
only essential uses and ``all non-essential personnel sent to their
barracks.''
   The storm also skirted Puerto Rico without causing any damage to
military facilities, Ross said.
   Sheets said Gilbert was expected next to sweep over the Cayman
Islands, on its westward track, and in two to three days veer
northwest into the southern Gulf of Mexico. Residents of the
neighboring Caymans, a British dependency to the northwest, were
urged to ``rush all preparatory actions.''
   The National Weather Service warned that the Caymans could
expect high waters and large waves ``which may undermine buildings
along the beaches.''
   ``All interests in the Western Caribbean should continue to
monitor the progress of this dangerous hurricane,'' the service
advised.
   Forecaster Hal Gerrish on Sunday described Gilbert ``certainly
one of the larger systems we've seen in the Caribbean for a long
time.''



 AP880915-0003 
AP-NR-09-15-88 0004EDT
u i AM-HurricaneGilbert 4thLd-Writethru   09-15 1136
AM-Hurricane Gilbert, 4th Ld - Writethru,a0897,1167
Storms Batter Yucatan; Thousands Flee
Eds: SUBS 6th graf pvs, `Army officials...' with two grafs to
UPDATE with total known evacuations on Yucatan; PICKS up 7th pvs:
The eye...; SUBS grafs 17-21 `At 9 p.m EDT ...a Category 4.' with
seven grafs to UPDATE with new wind speeds, distances, hurricane
forming double eye; PICKS up 22nd graf pvs: Only two...
LaserGraphic NY36, LaserMap WX14
By CHRIS ANGELO
Associated Press Writer
CANCUN, Mexico (AP) 

   Hurricane Gilbert, one of the strongest
storms ever, slammed into the Yucatan Peninsula Wednesday and
leveled thatched homes, tore off roofs, uprooted trees and cut off
the Caribbean resorts of Cancun and Cozumel.
   Looters roamed the streets of Cancun, stealing from stores whose
windows were blown away. Huge waves battered the beach resorts and
thousands were evacuated. Despite the intensity of the onslaught
and the ensuing heavy flooding, officials reported only two minor
injuries.
   The storm killed 19 people in Jamaica and five in the Dominican
Republic before moving west to Mexico. Prime Minister Edward Seaga
of Jamaica said Wednesday the storm destroyed an estimated 100,000
of Jamaica's 500,000 homes when it throttled the island Monday.
   The Jamaican Embassy reported earlier that 500,000 of the
nation's 2.3 million people were homeless.
   In Cancun, amateur radio operators said an oil tanker from the
fleet of the government oil monopoly Pemex, the Lazaro Cardenas,
had run aground on the beach in the Cancun hotel zone. Pemex
officials however said all their vessels were secure.
   Army officials in Mexico City said about 35,000 people were
evacuated from Cancun, but Cancun Mayor Jose Sanchez Zapata said
about 11,000 fled.
   More than 120,000 people on the northeast Yucatan coast were
evacuated, the Yucatan state government said.
   The eye of the storm passed over Cozumel and Cancun with howling
winds clocked at 160 mph at about 8 a.m. EDT. The winds bent and
toppled utility poles and uprooted slum dwellings.
   Ham radio operators around Cancun said Gilbert knocked down a
radio and television communications tower, uprooted trees and blew
the roofs off buildings.
   Floods prevented officials from reaching the hotel zone in
Cancun and there were no relief efforts under way by late
Wednesday. Shelters had little or no food, water or blankets and
power was out.
   ``We can't do it yet. The wind would blow them away,'' said an
army official at city hall who declined to give his name.
   Bands of 25-30 youths roamed the streets of Cancun Wednesday,
looting stores with shattered windows, said Alfredo Moro Sanchez,
investigative coordinator of the Quintana Roo state judicial police.
   He said he asked for army troops to halt the looting but none
had arrived by late Wednesday.
   About 150 tourists took refuge at the Cancun city hall.
Honeymooner Sheila Fournier of Long Island said she and her
husband, Pete, had been evacuated from the Villas Playa Hotel.
   ``It had an ocean-front view _ which is now washed away,'' she
said.
   Officials were checking low-lying areas of Cancun for stranded
residents. There was heavy damage visible to the humble wood and
thatch homes typical of the Yucatan.
   ``There were some people who did not want to leave yesterday,''
the army official said. ``It was something new. They didn't know
what a cyclone was.''
   At midnight EDT Gilbert was centered near latitude 21.5 north,
longitude 90.2 west and approaching the north coast of Yucatan,
about 60 miles east-northeast of the provincial capital, Merida,
the National Hurricane Center in Coral Gables, Fla., said. The
storm was about 550 miles southeast of Brownsville, Texas, the
center said in a statement.
   Gilbert was moving west-northwest at 15 mph and winds had
decreased to 125 mph. The Mexican National Weather Service reported
winds gusting as high as 218 mph earlier Wednesday with sustained
winds of 179 mph.
   Earlier Wednesday Gilbert was classified as a Category 5 storm,
the strongest ad deadliest type of hurricane. Such storms have
maximum sustained winds greater than 155 mph and can cause
catastrophic damage.
   By Wednesday night the National Hurricane Center downgraded it
to a Category 4, but center director Bob Sheets said:``There's no
question it'll strengthen again once it comes off the Yucatan
Peninsula and gets back in open water.''
   As Gilbert moved away from the Yucatan Peninsula Wednesday
night, the hurricane formed a double eye, two concentric circles of
thunderstorms often characteristic of a strong storm that has
crossed land and is moving over the water again.
   One eye was about eight miles wide, and the second about 25
miles wide, said hurricane center meteorologist Jesse Moore. ``This
is one of the features that we expected to see as the hurricane
moved back over the water, and we do expect intensification,'' he
said.
   Only two Category 5 hurricanes have hit the United States _ the
1935 storm that killed 408 people in Florida and Hurricane Camille
that devastated the Mississippi coast in 1969, killing 256 people.
   Oil companies evacuated thousands of workers from rigs in the
Gulf of Mexico.
   The peninsula ports of Campeche, Celestum, Progreso, Sinzal,
Ucaltepen, Tel-Chac, Cancun, Puerto Morelos, and Ciudad del Carmen
were closed, the government news agency Notimex said. Airports in
the region were closed.
   ``The sound of the wind outside is horrible,'' said receptionist
Pablo Torres at Cancun's Hotel Carrillos as the storm approached.
   The National Hurricane Center said a hurricane watch was in
effect on the Texas coast from Brownsville to Port Arthur and along
the coast of northeast Mexico from Tampico north.
   In Mexico City, the National Civil Defense System said it lost
telephone contact with Cancun and Cozumel at about 8 a.m. EDT.
   Public buildings in Cancun were used as shelters, said Cecila
Lavalle, a spokesman for Quintana Roo state government in Chetumal,
155 miles southeast of Cozumel.
   Jennie Valdez, a U.S. consular representative in Cancun, said
she did not know how many tourists were in Cancun, but government
figures estimate 40,000 to 65,000 monthly visitors.
   Hurricane warnings were in effect for the entire Yucatan
Peninsula and widespread evacuations were reported.
   Winds destroyed at least 100 homes in slums of Valladolid, a
town of about 45,000 about 100 miles from Cozumel, Alberto Pol, a
judicial police officer, said by telephone.
   The National Hurricane Center said Gilbert was the most intense
storm on record in terms of barometric pressure. It was measured at
26.31 inches, breaking the 26.35 inches recorded for the 1935
hurricane that devastated the Florida Keys.
   ``That's the lowest pressure ever measured in the Western
Hemisphere,'' said forecaster Mark Zimmer.
   On Sunday, Monday and Tuesday, Gilbert pounded the Dominican
Republic, Jamaica and the Cayman Islands.
   Seaga said Jamaica would need $8 billion in aid. Officials in
the Dominican Republic, sideswiped Sunday by the storm, reported
five dead.
   Gilbert also buffeted the Cayman Islands, but no deaths were
reported.



 AP880916-0060 
AP-NR-09-16-88 0410EDT
r a PM-Hurricane-Strength     09-16 0543
PM-Hurricane-Strength,0560
What Makes Gilbert So Strong?
With PM-Hurricane Gilbert, Bjt
By A.J. DICKERSON
Associated Press Writer
MIAMI (AP) 

   Hurricane Gilbert's growth from a harmless low
pressure zone off Africa to a ferocious killer in the Gulf of
Mexico was fueled by a combination of heat, moisture and wind that
baffles forecasters.
   ``It's a matter of getting everything together in the right
place in the right time,'' Gil Clark of the National Hurricane
Center said Thursday. ``It doesn't happen very often. How it
develops, we don't know.''
   Gilbert came to the attention of center forecasters Sept. 3 as a
dry low pressure trough moving west out of Africa.
   ``We get 50 or 60 of these off Africa every summer. About one of
six develop,'' said Clark.
   By Sept. 8, the system became a depression. It reached tropical
storm status by Saturday and a hurricane Sunday.
   A tropical wave becomes a depression when winds start swirling.
When sustained winds reach 39 mph, the system becomes a named
tropical storm. It reaches hurricane status when sustained winds
hit 74 mph.
   Why Gilbert organized and strengthened while other systems
didn't ``is a mystery more or less,'' said University of Miami
meteorology Professor Rainer Bleck.
   ``The first part of the summer we were biting our nails,
wondering why these (other) disturbances didn't develop,'' he said
Thursday. ``That's something meteorologists would like to know more
about.''
   But the scientists do know what fuels a budding storm once
development begins. And they know that development is sparked when
winds converge, and that growth is affected by time and place.
   ``If that happens in an area where there's plenty of moisture in
the lower atmosphere (the bottom 10,000 feet or so), this
convergence may lead to upward motion and cloud formation,'' Bleck
said.
   ``If clouds form, the heat of condensation in the clouds
occasionally provides `positive feedback' to the convergence
pattern. That strengthens it,'' he said, adding that storms can
begin budding only off the equator because of the Earth's rotation.
   Eventually, a vortex is created.
   ``Any time you contract an air mass, they will start spinning.
That's what makes the tornadoes, hurricanes and blizzards, those
winter storms,'' Bleck said.
   Hurricanes ``are useful to the climate machine. Their primary
role is to transport heat from the lower to the upper atmosphere,''
he said. ``The sun puts energy into the water, the top of the
oceans and lowest part of the atmosphere. That has to be
distributed from the bottom to higher levels of the atmosphere.''
   When the depression that would become Gilbert neared Barbados,
warm Atlantic waters nurtured it.
   ``This time of year in the northwest Caribbean is best for
development,'' Clark said. ``If you get a storm in this area in
September, when the water's warmest, it can just explode. This is
where Camille formed and exploded,'' referring to the 1969 storm
that slammed into the Gulf Coast.
   ``It is an exciting thing to watch. If you're on the beach
watching the storm surge, it's a different story,'' he said.
   The hurricane center said Gilbert was the most intense storm on
record in terms of barometric pressure, measured at 26.13 inches
Tuesday night. That broke the 26.35 inches of the 1935 hurricane
that devastated the Florida Keys.



 WSJ880912-0064 
 Hurricane Gilbert Heading for Jamaica With 100 MPH Winds 
 
 LATAM 
 SANTO DOMINGO, Dominican Republic (AP)  

   Hurricane Gilbert swept toward Jamaica yesterday with 100-mile-an-hour winds, and officials issued warnings to residents on the southern coasts of the Dominican Republic, Haiti and Cuba. 

   The storm ripped the roofs off houses and caused coastal flooding in Puerto Rico. 
In the Dominican Republic, all domestic flights and flights to and from Puerto Rico and Miami were canceled. 

   Forecasters said the hurricane was gaining strength as it passed over the ocean and would dump heavy rain on the Dominican Republic and Haiti as it moved south of Hispaniola, the Caribbean island they share, and headed west. 

   "It's still gaining strength. 
It's certainly one of the larger systems we've seen in the Caribbean for a long time," said Hal Gerrish, forecaster at the National Hurricane Center in Coral Gables, Fla. 

   At 3 p.m. EDT, the center of the hurricane was about 100 miles south of the Dominican Republic and 425 miles east of Kingston, Jamaica. 
The hurricane was moving west at about 15 mph and was expected to continue this motion for the next 24 hours. 
Forecasters said the hurricane's track would take it about 50 miles south of southwestern Haiti. 

   The hurricane center said small craft in the Virgin Islands and Puerto Rico should remain in port until conditions improve. 

   The forecasters said the Dominican Republic would get as much as 10 inches of rain yesterday, with similar amounts falling in Haiti last night and tonight. 
Hurricane warnings were issued for the south coast of Haiti and Cuba by their respective governments. 
In Jamaica, the government issued a hurricane watch for the entire island. 

   Tropical Storm Gilbert formed in the eastern Caribbean and strengthened into a hurricane Saturday night. 

   In Puerto Rico, besides tearing off several roofs, the storm caused coastal flooding and brought down power lines and trees along roads and highways in the west and southwestern regions. 

   Three people were injured in Guayanilla, Puerto Rico, when a tree fell on their vehicle as they traveled along Route 97, police reported. 
Four policemen stationed on Mona Island, between Puerto Rico and the Dominican Republic, were stranded as a result of the weather. 




 AP891018-0301 
AP-NR-10-18-89 1832EDT
u f AM-SFQuake-Insurance     10-18 0653
AM-SF Quake-Insurance,0672
Many Homeowners Not Insured; Analysts Say Disaster May Benefit Insurers
By DEAN GOLEMBESKI
Associated Press Writer
HARTFORD, Conn. (AP) 

   Most San Francisco-area homeowners may
have to pay for damage from Tuesday's earthquake out of their own
pockets, while insurance companies may reap long-term benefits from
higher rates, industry spokesmen and analysts said Wednesday.
   Only 15 percent to 20 percent of California homeowners have
earthquake insurance, which typically requires a 10 percent
deductible and costs between $200 to $400 a year for a $100,000
home, according to industry spokesmen.
   The Association of California Insurance Cos. in Sacramento said
that in the San Francisco area roughly 25 to 30 percent of the
homes have earthquake insurance. The organization estimated
residential damages from Tuesday's earthquake at $500 million in
the Bay area, with between $100 million to $150 million insured.
   Insured homeowners without earthquake protection will get
reimbursed only if their homes were ravaged by fire, which is
covered under basic homeowner insurance polices, said Hugh Strawn,
director of catastrophe services at the Property Loss Research
Bureau in Schaumburg, Ill.
   Insurance companies attempted Wednesday to assess the amount of
quake-related damages they're likely to have to pay. In addition to
home damage, the companies likely will get claims for automobile
damage, broken glass, theft and burglary, business interruption due
to electrical outages, water damage and, possibly, workers
compensation.
   Some estimated that insurers might face bills totaling $1
billion or more from the quake. But industry observers said they
don't expect any company to suffer serious financial damage from
quake-related claims.
   ``We don't think any company is going to have problems paying
claims,'' said Elisa Siegal, public affairs manager for the
American Insurance Association, a Washington-based trade group.
   The insurers actually could benefit. Industry analysts predicted
insurers would be able to reverse three years of declining rates
and win rate hikes from state regulators due to the quake damages
and the estimated $4 billion in damages from Hurricane Hugo, which
hammered South Carolina and other parts of the southeastern United
States earlier this month.
   An increase in insurance rates could translate into greater
profitability in the long term, the analysts said.
   ``There's a perception that this could turn the cycle ... that
this could be enough to firm pricing,'' said Gloria L. Vogel, an
analyst with Bear, Stearns & Co. Inc. in New York.
   Despite their predictions for the long run, the analysts warned
that fourth-quarter earnings among insurance companies are likely
to be disappointing.
   ``It's going to be a meaningful loss, perhaps as big as Hugo,''
said Robert Glasspiegel, an analyst with Hartford-based Langen
McAlenney.
   On the New York Stock Exchange, some insurance company stock
rose on Wednesday. Aetna Life & Casualty Co. rose $2.37{ to $59.50
a share; ITT Corp., parent of The Hartford, was up 37{ cents to
$59; and the Travelers Cos. rose $1 to $40.87{.
   Reinsurance companies, which absorb risk from policy writers,
did especially well. General Re Corp. rose $2.75 to $86.50 and
Marsh & McLennan Cos. rose $3.12{ to $75.87{.
   In California, earthquake insurance is an emotional and
politically-charged issue. Roughly two-thirds of all insurance
policies written in the United States are sold in California, where
many of the nation's most damaging earthquakes have occurred..
   Under a 1985 California law, insurers are required to offer
earthquake insurance to homebuyers, but homebuyers are not required
to buy the coverage.
   Insurers aren't required to offer earthquake insurance to
commercial property owners, but the percentage of business property
with the coverage is very high, industry spokesmen said. They
estimated that at least 25 percent, and probably many more,
business properties are insured.
   Because of its high costs, earthquake insurance has become a
target of the controversial Proposition 103 approved by California
voters last year. The proposition calls for a 20 percent rollback
in insurance rates. Insurers and state regulators are battling over
the rates and how they're set.



 LA102089-0177 
 123463 


October 20, 1989, Friday, Home Edition 




Special Section; Part Q; Page 12; Column 4; Metro Desk 




151 words 




THE BAY AREA QUAKE; 


WHAT NEXT?; 


PONDERING THE LESSONS, HEALING THE SCARS 




"I've been wandering around San Francisco and it's like the blind man trying to 
feel an elephant. We're just now figuring out bits and pieces of this 
disaster." -- Tom Tobin, of the California Seismic Safety Commission. 




"It was like somebody slugging a punching bag. Usually earthquakes pass, but 
this one went on and on. It just wouldn't stop...It was very, very bad." -- 
Schoolteacher Flora Churnin, who was at her Silicon Valley town of Sunnyvale 
when the earthquake struck. 




"At first I thought the smoke was fog. Then I could see a big ball of flame." 
-- Cecile Candone, who was driving south toward San Francisco from the Sonoma 
wine country when she spotted the Marina district fire. 




"This upper deck was absolutely shaking, the light stanchions were blowing back 
and forth." -- Suzyn Waldman, a reporter covering the World Series at 
Candlestick Park for a New York radio station. 




EARTHQUAKES -- SAN FRANCISCO; EARTHQUAKES -- NORTHERN CALIFORNIA; OAKLAND (CA); 
DISASTER VICTIMS 




 LA102489-0131 
 125161 


October 24, 1989, Tuesday, Home Edition 




Metro; Part B; Page 6; Column 1; Editorial Writers Desk 




652 words 




A SPECIAL SESSION, WITH SPEED 




Gov. George Deukmejian is right to call the Legislature into special session 
within the next two weeks to deal with the effects of last Tuesday's Northern 
California earthquake. With Congress already moving to grant up to $3 billion 
in relief, earthquake victims need to know that state officials are prepared to 
come up with the state's share of disaster and reconstruction aid as soon as 
possible, and as soon as is practical. Deukmejian should be commended, as well, 
for advising state officials to do all they can to expedite aid to earthquake 
victims without getting too tangled up in red tape. 


The governor is wrong, however, in his campaign to distance himself from the 
California Department of Transportation on the issue of what caused the Nimitz 
Freeway in Oakland to collapse, and what could or should have been done to have 
prevented it. While Deukmejian is not necessarily blaming Caltrans, he seems to 
be preparing himself for such investigatory questions as: "What did you know 
and when did you know it?" 


The governor's answer, which he has been repeating ever since the day of the 
quake, was that no one in Caltrans ever told him a freeway might collapse in an 
earthquake. He was shocked that such a thing would happen. This has the 
earmarks of a preemptive defense against any allegation that California stinted 
on highway reinforcement because transportation funds have been short during 
his administration, possibly because he had opposed a gasoline tax increase. 


There is keen interest, of course, in why the freeway collapsed, and whether 
something might have been done. The major reason is so that California can 
learn from the experience as it designs new roads and reinforces existing ones 
against the next quake. There has been no widespread outcry against the 
governor. While the Department of Transportation and the state Transportation 
Commission do exercise considerable control over the allocation of highway 
funds, the governor also sets general state priorities. 


The governor complained on Sunday that the highway engineers never came to him 
and told him that bridges or freeways might collapse in an earthquake. But no 
one who has lived in California more than a few months would rule out the 
chance that any bridge or freeway could collapse in the right kind of 
earthquake. California is on the edge of earthquake-related technology, but 
still does not know everything that needs to be known. The state learns more 
from every earthquake and a critical need now is to learn everything possible 
from Tuesday, Oct. 17. 


But it is also the time to concentrate on helping quake victims through these 
most trying days of their experience -- the period when the emergency response 
is over and people face the dreary details of restoring their life to some kind 
of normality. In the Bay Area, that includes hundreds of thousands of commuters 
who did not suffer personal damage, but face massive obstacles in getting to 
work. 


The governor and legislative leaders will meet again next Monday to determine 
the timing and agenda of a special session. It almost certainly would include a 
temporary gasoline-tax increase to deal with highway reconstruction and repair 
and possible general revenues for other forms of disaster relief. Existing law 
already gives the governor considerable discretion in diverting reserve funds 
on hand to the Office of Emergency Services for allocation to local 
governments. But the need could well exceed the present reserve. The scope of 
the disaster would seem to justify a temporary surcharge. 


The governor and Legislature should not wait too long to start the session, 
although they do not yet have precise damage estimates or know just how much 
the federal government will send to California. The Legislature can begin 
organizing its staff and committees now so the appropriate legislation can be 
passed as soon as that information is obtained. 




Editorial 




 WSJ891019-0021 
 = 891019 
 891019-0021. 
 The Bay Area Earthquake:
@  Bush Makes Sure He Acts
@  Speedily on Quake Crisis 
 10/19/89 
 WALL STREET JOURNAL (J) 
 EXECUTIVE (EXE) 
 WASHINGTON  

   The White House is making sure nobody will accuse it of taking this crisis lightly. 

   In the aftermath of the California earthquake, President Bush and his aides flew into a whirlwind of earthquake-related activity yesterday morning. 
Some of it was necessary to get federal help flowing to victims, but some seemed designed mostly to project an image of a White House in action. 

   Mr. Bush and his aides were accused of responding too slowly after the Exxon Valdez oil tanker split open in Alaskan waters and Hurricane Hugo struck the Carolina coast, and they clearly don't want a repeat of those charges now. 
So the White House announced that Mr. Bush got his first earthquake briefing of the day at 6:30 a.m. from chief of staff John Sununu. 

   By noon, Mr. Bush had taken two phone calls from Vice President Dan Quayle, who was in California; made a televised statement of concern; signed a disaster proclamation; received a written report from the Federal Emergency Management Agency; and visited FEMA headquarters. 

   Mr. Bush himself essentially acknowledged that he and his aides were trying to head off criticism. 
On his FEMA visit, Mr. Bush said that he hoped there would be "less carping" about the emergency office's performance this time, adding that the agency "took a hit" for its reaction to Hurricane Hugo. 

   The White House already is talking of Mr. Bush visiting the California earthquake site this weekend. 
He visited the Hugo devastation but not until after local leaders urged him to do so. 




 WSJ891019-0086 
 = 891019 
 891019-0086. 
 The Bay Area Earthquake:
@  Insurance Firms Expected
@  To Pay Billions of Dollars
@  ----
@  By Beatrice E. Garcia and Karen Slater
@  Staff Reporters of The Wall Street Journal 
 10/19/89 
 WALL STREET JOURNAL (J) 
 S AET FFC CI AIG GRN MMC 
 INSURANCE (INS) 

   Insurers face the prospect of paying out billions of dollars for damages caused by this week's California earthquake. 

   Getting a grip on the extent of the damages is proving a far more difficult task than what insurers faced after Hurricane Hugo ripped through the Caribbean and the Carolinas last month. 
The earthquake's toll, including possible deep structural damage, goes far beyond the more easily observed damage from a hurricane, says George Reider, a vice president in Aetna Life & Casualty Insurance Co.'s claims division. 

   But investors are betting that the financial and psychological impact of the earthquake, coming so soon after the hurricane, will help stem more than two years of intense price-cutting wars among business insurers. 
Reflecting that logic, insurance-company stocks posted strong gains. 

   Aetna and other insurers are hiring engineers and architects to help them assess structural damage. 
Most insurers already have mobilized their "catastrophe" teams to begin processing claims from their policyholders in northern California. 

   Since commercial air travel is interrupted, Aetna, based in Hartford, Conn., chartered three planes to fly claims adjusters into Sacramento and then planned for them to drive to the Bay area. 
About 25 adjusters were dispatched yesterday afternoon, along with laptop computers, cellular phones and blank checks. 

   Some adjusters, already in other parts of California, drove to the disaster area with recreational vehicles and mobile homes that could be used as makeshift claims-processing centers. 

   Insurers will be advertising 800 numbers -- probably on the radio -- that policyholders can call to get assistance on how to submit claims. 

   State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Co., the largest home and auto insurer in California, believes the losses from the earthquake could be somewhat less than the $475 million in damages it expects to pay out for claims resulting from Hurricane Hugo. 
State Farm, based in Bloomington, Ind., is also the largest writer of personal-property earthquake insurance in California. 

   Earthquake insurance is sold as a separate policy or a specific endorsement "rider" on a homeowner's policy in California, because of the area's vulnerability to earthquakes. 
State Farm said about 25% of its policyholders in California have also purchased earthquake insurance. 
Allstate Insurance Co., a unit of Sears, Roebuck & Co., said about 23% of its personal property policyholders -- about 28% in the San Franciso area -- also have earthquake coverage. 

   The Association of California Insurance Companies estimated damage to residential property could total $500 million, but only $100 million to $150 million is insured, it said. 

   Officials from the American Insurance Association's property-claim service division, which coordinates the efforts of the claims adjusters in an area after a natural disaster, will be flying to San Francisco today. 
They expect to have a preliminary estimate of the damages in a day or two. 

   Roads and bridges in the Bay area appear to have suffered some of the most costly damage. 
Highways, such as the section of Interstate 880 that collapsed in Oakland, generally don't have insurance coverage. 
Industry officials say the Bay Bridge -- unlike some bridges -- has no earthquake coverage, either, so the cost of repairing it probably would have to be paid out of state general operating funds. 

   However, the bridge, which charges a $1 toll each way, does have "loss of income" insurance to replace lost revenue if the operation of the bridge is interrupted for more than seven days. 
That coverage is provided by a syndicate of insurance companies including Fireman's Fund Corp., based in Novato, Calif., and Cigna Corp., based in Philadelphia. 

   Earthquake-related claims aren't expected to cause significant financial problems for the insurance industry as a whole. 
Instead, even with the liabilities of two natural disasters in recent weeks, analysts said the total capital of the industry is likely to be higher at year end than it was at midyear. 

   Indeed, the earthquake could contribute to a turnaround in the insurance cycle in a couple of ways. 
For example, insurers may seek to limit their future exposure to catastrophes by increasing the amount of reinsurance they buy. 
Such increased demand for reinsurance, along with the losses the reinsurers will bear from these two disasters, are likely to spur increases in reinsurance prices that will later be translated into an overall price rise. 
Reinsurance is protection taken out by the insurance firms themselves. 

   "We are saying this is the breaking point, this is the event that will change the psychology of the marketplace," said William Yankus, an analyst with Conning & Co., a Hartford firm that specializes in the insurance industry. 
His firm, along with some others, issued new buy recommendations on insurer stocks yesterday. 

   Among the insurance stocks, big gainers included American International Group, up $3.25 to $102.625; General Re Corp., up $2.75 to $86.50; Aetna, up $2.375 to $59.50; and Marsh & McLennan Inc., up $3.125 to $75.875. 

   Still, a few individual companies, most likely smaller ones, could be devastated. 
"I think there is a damned good chance someone is going to hit the skids on this," said Oppenheimer & Co. analyst Myron Picoult. 
He suspects some insurers who had purchased reinsurance to limit their exposure to catastrophes will discover that reinsurance was used up by Hurricane Hugo. 

   British, West German, Scandinavian and other overseas insurers are bracing for big claims from the San Francisco earthquake disaster. 
Although it's unclear how much exposure the London market will face, U.K. underwriters traditionally have a large reinsurance exposure to U.S. catastrophe coverage. 
Jack Byrne, chairman of Fireman's Fund, said this disaster will test the catastrophe reinsurance market, causing these rates to soar. 

   The catastrophe losses sustained by insurers this year will probably be the worst on an inflation-adjusted basis since 1906 -- when another earthquake sparked the Great San Francisco Fire. 
Orin Kramer, an insurance consultant in New York, estimates that the 1906 San Francisco destruction, on an inflation-adjusted basis, included insured losses of $5.8 billion. 
He is estimating this week's disaster will generate insured losses of $2 billion to $4 billion, following about $4 billion in costs to insurers from Hurricane Hugo. 




 AP890922-0071 
AP-NR-09-22-89 0634EDT
u i Britain-Blast 3rdLd-Writethru a0526 09-22 0467
Britain-Blast, 3rd Ld-Writethru, a0526,0477
Eight Dead, Up to 18 Missing After Explosion at Marine Band Complex
Eds: LEADS with 7 grafs to UPDATE with eight dead, Scotland Yard
sending anti-terrorist unit to investigate; pickup 7th graf pvs, `Ten doctors...'
By LESLIE SHEPHERD
Associated Press Writer
LONDON (AP) 

   An explosion rocked the Royal Marines School of
Music in a southeastern coastal town today, causing one building to
collapse and killing eight people, officials said. Thirty people
were injured and up to 18 were missing and feared trapped in the
rubble.
   The blast occurred at at 8:26 a.m. in a lounge in the barracks
near Deal, about 70 miles southeast of London, the Defense Ministry
said.
   ``The building has collapsed,'' said a ministry spokesman,
speaking anonymously in keeping with British custom.
   ``We've no idea of the cause of the blast at the moment. It is
too early to tell.''
   Scotland Yard said a forensic team from its anti-terrorist squad
had been called in to help investigate.
   Firefighters used heavy lifting equipment and thermal cameras to
search for those trapped in the debris, said Kent Fire Brigade
spokesman Kevin Simmons.
   Kent police said 17 or 18 people were trapped. The Defense
Ministry said seven were missing.
   Ten doctors gave emergency treatment at the scene and 11
ambulances took the injured to two hospitals, the ambulance service
said.
   ``They are suffering from flash burns to their head and arms,
fractures, and the sort of injuries you would expect after an
explosion,'' said a spokesman for Buckland Hospital in Dover, 20
miles south of Deal.
   South Eastern British Gas sent investigators to the scene but
said there was nothing to indicate the explosion was caused by a gas
leak. Gas supplies to the barracks were cut as a precautionary
measure, a spokesman said.
   Guy Platts, who owns a bookstore in Deal, located 20 miles north
of the English Channel port of Dover, said he heard a ``massive
explosion. ... There are dozens of ambulances, police and fire
brigade making their way there.''
   Military targets on the British mainland have been attacked
several times by the Irish Republican Army in the past year as part
of its campaign to rid Northern Ireland of British rule.
   One soldier was killed and nine wounded in an IRA attack on an
army barracks in north London in August 1988. About 60 soldiers
narrowly escaped death or injury in February when they were
evacuated from their barracks in Shropshire, western England, just
before a bomb exploded.
   In July 1982, eight soldiers died in IRA bombings near the
Household Cavalry barracks at Knightsbridge in central London and at
a bandstand in the capital's Regent's Park where an army band was
playing. Three people died later and a total of 51 were injured in
the bombings.



 AP890922-0103 
AP-NR-09-22-89 1143EDT
u i PM-Blast-Witnesses 1stLd-Writethru   09-22 0511
PM-Blast-Witnesses, 1st Ld-Writethru,a0566,0525
Neighbors Tell of Being Jolted out of Bed by `Blitz' Blast
Eds: Subs 3rd pvs, ``The Irish...' with 1 graf to ADD police count
of casualties. Pickup 4th pvs, `Nearby resident...'
With PM-Britain-Blast
By MAUREEN JOHNSON
Associated Press Writer
DEAL, England (AP) 

   Neighbors were breakfasting, heading to work
or asleep in bed when an explosion at a military barracks turned
their homes to rubble and they were confronted with the sight of
bodies being carried away.
   ``There was a terrific crash which reminded me of the Blitz.
After that, the ceiling started to fall down around me,'' said Joan
Betteridge, a pensioner in the southern England town of Deal, where
the blast at the Royal Marines School of Music occurred.
   The Irish Republican Army claimed reponsibilty for the explosion,
which police said killed 11 people and injured 22.
   Nearby resident Sean Minnock said: ``I was asleep but woke up
with a hell of a jolt ... the bedroom ceiling fell in on me. I woke
to find huge slabs of plaster on the bed and floor.''
   From the wrecked, smoke-clouded barracks, ``I could hear
terrified screams of agony. People started rushing about all over
the place. It was horrible to watch and listen to,'' said Minnock,
28.
   ``I knew people had been seriously hurt. I saw the rescuers pull
out two bodies. I knew they were dead when they put them on the
floor and put bed blankets right over them.''
   Minnock's wife, Janet, said the roof of their house was torn off
and all the back windows were shattered.
   ``The house has been blown to bits,'' she said.
   Mrs. Minnock was feeding her 2-year-old son Thomas his breakfast
when the explosion wrecked four terraced houses in the street
backing onto the barracks.
   Her next-door neighbor, Heather Hackett, 26, was standing at her
kitchen window facing the barracks, holding her 4-month-old son Luke
in her arms. Her other boys, Ben, 3, and Joshua, 2, were at her side.
   ``I looked up from the sink and I just saw the whole building
explode,'' she said. ``I told the boys to run and as Joshua turned a
sliver of glass embedded itself in his back.
   ``The whole window was blown across the kitchen. I just screamed
and ran out of the room. The bang was so loud I thought the whole
house was coming in.
   ``At first I thought for sure Joshua had been seriously injured.
There was blood coming out of his back.'' Doctors removed the glass
and sent him home.
   College student Simon Mitford, 17, narrowly escaped being injured
in the explosion because he got up earlier than usual.
   ``His room was completely wrecked by the blast,'' his brother
Alex said.
   Of the barracks, he said: ``I heard music playing and then it
went bang and there was glass everywhere. It was a two-story
building but now 90 percent of it is rubble.
   ``I heard a marine scream out, `The band is under there.' I was
scared there was going to be a second explosion.''



 AP890922-0117 
AP-NR-09-22-89 1241EDT
u i PM-Britain-Blast 9thLd-Writethru a0619 09-22 0844
PM-Britain-Blast, 9th Ld-Writethru, a0619,0865
11 Dead, 22 Injured in IRA Explosion
Eds: Leads with 4 grafs to UPDATE with all accounted for, many of
the injured seriously hurt. Pickup 4th graf, ``There was...''
LaserPhoto LON6
By MAUREEN JOHNSON
Associated Press Writer
DEAL, England (AP) 

   An explosion today flattened a military
barracks and tore through nearby homes, killing 11 people and
injuring 22, police said. The IRA claimed responsibility for the
blast.
   More than 100 rescue workers frantically dug through the rubble
of a three-story building that collapsed at the Royal Marines School
of Music near Deal. Stunned neighbors gathered outside homes that
were damaged or destroyed.
   Chief Police Inspector Alan Butterfield of Kent, who who provided
the casualty figures and coordinated the rescue effort, first
reported that one person was missing but later said everyone was
accounted for.
   He said many of the injured were seriously hurt.
   ``There was a terrific crash which reminded me of the Blitz.
After that, the ceiling started to fall down around me,'' said
pensioner Joan Betteridge.
   Defense Secretary Tom King, inspecting the wreckage, said: ``It
is not yet absolutely confirmed that it is a bomb, but all the
evidence is quite clearly that this is an IRA atrocity.''
   British military installations are a frequent bombing target of
the Irish Republican Army in its campaign to rid Northern Ireland of
British rule, but today's explosion in the coastal town 70 miles
southeast of London was the worst IRA attack on the British mainland
in more than seven years.
   The explosion occurred at at 8:26 a.m. in a lounge in the
barracks. One of the bands had just stopped playing on the parade
ground, said a ministry spokesman, speaking anonymously in keeping
with British custom.
   Dozens of homes near the school were damaged, including four that
were destroyed. Witnesses reported hearing the explosion two miles
away.
   The Defense Ministry would not say how many servicemen and
civilians were included in the casualty figures. However, King told
reporters the attack was directed against ``unarmed bandsmen.''
   Firefighters used heavy lifting equipment and thermal cameras to
search through the debris, said Kent Fire Brigade spokesman Kevin
Simmons.
   Ten doctors were giving emergency treatment at the scene and 11
ambulances were taking the injured to two hospitals, the ambulance
service said.
   A statement telephoned to Ireland International, a Dublin news
agency, said ``we have visited the Royal Marines in Kent'' in
response to Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher's visit to Northern
Ireland nine days ago.
   The IRA said Mrs. Thatcher went to the British province ``with a
message of war,'' but ``we still want peace and we want the British
government to leave our country.'' It was signed P. O'Neill, a nom
de guerre the IRA usually uses to claim responsibility for actions
outside Northern Ireland.
   Irish Prime Minister Charles Haughey issued a statement in Dublin
condemning the attack, calling it an ``outrage.''
   The last IRA bomb attempt on the British mainland was in February
when about 60 soldiers were evacuated from their barracks in
Shropshire, western England, just before a bomb exploded. One
soldier was killed and nine wounded in an IRA bomb attack on an army
barracks in north London in August 1988.
   In July 1982, eight soldiers died in IRA bombings near the
Household Cavalry barracks in central London and at a bandstand in
the capital's Regent's Park where an army band was playing. Three
people died later and a total of 51 were injured in the bombings.
   The music school is the training center for young recruits who
want to play in the seven Royal Marines bands. Up to 250 young men,
most between 16 and 20, are based at the school, where they receive
military and musical training.
   The roof of Janet Minnock's house was torn off by the force of
the blast and all the back windows were shattered.
   ``The house has been blown to bits,'' she said. ``We are all
shaken up.''
   Mrs. Minnock's next-door neighbor, Heather Hackett, said she was
standing at her kitchen window facing the barracks at the time of
the explosion. She was holding her 4-month-old son Luke in her arms
with her other boys, Ben, 3, and Joshua, 2, at her side.
   ``I looked up from the sink and I just saw the whole building
explode,'' she said. ``I told the boys to run and as Joshua turned a
slither of glass embedded itself in his back. The whole window was
blown across the kitchen. I just screamed and ran out of the room.
The bang was so loud I thought the whole house was coming in.''
   Sean Minnock said: ``I was asleep but woke up with a hell of a
jolt.''
   As workers tried to patch holes in his roof, he said: ``The
bedroom ceiling fell in on me. I woke to find huge slabs of plaster
on the bed and floor. I wondered what it was. As soon as I got up I
looked out of what was left of the window and knew it was the
barracks.''



 AP890923-0012 
AP-NR-09-23-89 0100EDT
u i PM-Britain-Blast Bjt   09-23 0782
PM-Britain-Blast, Bjt,0808
IRA Attack Stirs Security Controversy
By MAUREEN JOHNSON
Associated Press Writer
DEAL, England (AP) 

   The IRA bombing that killed 10 men and blew
apart a building at the Royal Marines Music School outraged Britons
and stirred recriminations over safety standards at the school.
   A huge explosion in a barracks staff room Friday morning leveled
the three-story building as bandsmen took a coffee break between
practice sessions on the school's parade ground.
   Twelve of the 22 people injured were hospitalized, eight of them
in serious condition, police said. They said nine of the dead were
bandsmen and one other man was not immediately identified.
   Dozens of neighboring homes in the quiet southeastern English
seaside town of Deal were damaged.
   Although trainees at the school range in age from 16 to 20, Col.
John Ware, principal director of music, said the slain bandsmen all
were trained, adult musicians. They held military ranks but none had
been trained as a fighting soldier.
   The outlawed Irish Republican Army, engaged in a 20-year-old
campaign to drive the British from the province of Northern Ireland,
claimed responsibility in a telephone call to Ireland International,
a Dublin news agency.
   Residents of the area adjoining the Marines school said Friday
that despite government calls for stepped-up public alertness
against terrorists, security at the school had eased noticeably.
   ``Anyone in Deal will tell you how easy it is to get into the
base,'' said Fred Verge, a 70-year-old army veteran.
   Local people laid wreaths and bouquets of flowers at the entrance
to the barracks.
   ``There is a great sense of anger'' in the community, Kent police
Chief Constable Paul Condon said.
   The Royal Marines Music School is one of 30 military
establishments in Britain that use private security firms, Defense
Ministry figures show.
   Unidentified defense sources quoted by the Times newspaper today
said the civilian guards were backed up by armed Marines who
patrolled regularly inside the perimeter.
   Defense Secretary Tom King promised a security review and said
new measures had already been taken at the base. He did not
elaborate.
   Martin O'Neill, the opposition Labor Party's spokesman on
defense, said on Friday: ``Serious questions must be asked about the
penny-pinching policy of the Ministry of Defense, which may well put
our armed services at dreadful risk.''
   O'Neill later told British Broadcasting Corp. television the IRA
was ``prepared to take out anybody. The cowardly nature of their
attacks is such that every military establishment is under threat.''
   He said private security firms were assigned to areas considered
low risks for attacks.
   ``If we designate places as being low-risk categories, then it is
likely they will be attacked, given the way that the IRA is forced
to operate,'' O'Neill added.
   ``The big prizes are no longer available to them, so they're
picking off the ones which they regard ... vulnerable.''
   Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher received news of the bombing
while aboard a jet over Siberia en route from Japan to Moscow. She
called it a ``deeply serious outrage.''
   King visited the scene soon after the explosion.
   ``I know that the people who committed it, the godfathers who
sent them, actually know in their hearts that it is not going to
make any difference; that it is just killing for the sake of
killing,'' he said.
   The defense minister, anger clearly written on his face, said
that rather than erode the will of the security forces, the attack
``redoubles their determination to ensure that terrorism cannot
win.''
   Prime Minister Charles Haughey of Ireland condemned the attack
and sent Mrs. Thatcher a message of sympathy at ``this outrage ...
which has caused severe and tragic loss of life and many injuries.''
   The mainly Roman Catholic IRA claim gave no details of the
operation, but said it was a response to a ``message of war''
delivered by Mrs. Thatcher when she visited Northern Ireland nine
days ago.
   It was an apparent reference to her speech praising the locally
recruited Ulster Defense Regiment as ``a very, very brave group of
men'' who have lost 179 members in IRA attacks since 1970.
   The mainly Protestant UDR is regarded by many Catholics as a
sectarian force, and is at present under a cloud over allegations
that some recruits leaked names, addresses and photos of IRA
suspects to Protestant assassins.
   British military installations are a frequent target of the IRA
campaign. Friday's attack was the worst since July 1982 when 11
servicemen were fatally wounded in two bombings in central London.
   The music school trains young recruits for the seven Royal
Marines bands. Up to 250 young men, most ages 16 to 20, undergo
military and musical training there, working with older,
professional bandsmen.



 AP890923-0091 
AP-NR-09-23-89 1402EDT
u i AM-Britain-Blast     09-23 0521
AM-Britain-Blast,0538
Police Search Local House for Clues to Marines Attack
DEAL, England (AP) 

   Family members on Saturday grieved for their
slain loved ones and criticized the security arrangements at the
Royal Marines Music School, where an IRA terrorist attack killed 10
military musicians.
   Jean Cleatheroe, whose son Andrew was killed, joined local
residents and opposition politicians in denouncing the use of
private security firms to protect the music school and 29 other
military establishments in Britain.
   ``The security at those barracks was absolutely abysmal. We had
seen it for ourselves. We have always said how easy it would be for
anyone to get in ... What could ordinary security men do to stop
terrorists?'' she said.
   British military installations are a frequent target of the IRA's
campaign to end British rule in Northern Ireland and unite the
predominantly Protestant province with the mainly Roman Catholic
Republic of Ireland.
   Friday's attack was the worst since July 1982, when 11 servicemen
were fatally wounded in bombings in central London.
   Shocked residents of Deal gathered outside the barracks to lay
flowers in tribute to the young men they called the ``Bandies.''
   An 11-year-old Royal Marines cadet in full dress uniform marched
to the barracks and smartly saluted the Royal Marines sign.
   ``I'm proud of my uniform and I'm proud of all the Marines I
knew. I hate the people who did this to them,'' said Scott Roberts.
   Archbishop of Canterbury Robert Runcie, spiritual leader of the
Church of England, visited the injured and said he was impressed
``by their strength and determination that evil will not defeat
them.''
   Runcie said one of the men's main concerns was that their hands
would heal properly so they could continue playing their musical
instruments.
   Police investigating the attack were searching a nearby house
that had been rented briefly by three men with Irish accents.
   ``We know when the men arrived and when they left,'' Cmdr. George
Churchill-Coleman, head of Scotland Yard's anti-terrorist squad,
said at a news conference. ``It appears the men left several days
before the explosion.''
   He said the house, which overlooks the barracks recreation center
destroyed by the Friday morning blast, was rented by its English
owners to three men for two to three weeks.
   There was no proof the house was an IRA hideout, the commander
said.
   ``By virtue of the fact that the house is very near the base and
the men are Irish, we are very anxious to talk to them,'' he said.
   Explosives experts wearing white protective overalls were
painstakingly examining the house Saturday, and Churchill-Coleman
said they would continue for the next two or three days.
   Police said all 10 men killed during a coffee break between
morning band practices were servicemen. Of 22 men injured, 12
remained hospitalized Saturday, five in serious condition.
   The Irish Republican Army on Friday claimed responsibility for
the explosion, which also severely damaged several nearby houses.
   Police have not determined what caused the blast, but
Churchill-Coleman said, ``It would seem to be some form of
improvised device using high explosives.'' The IRA did not specify
how it caused the blast.



 AP890924-0025 
AP-NR-09-24-89 1336EDT
r i AM-Britain-IRA     09-24 0522
AM-Britain-IRA,0537
Prince Philip Condemns IRA, Clergy Urge Forgiveness
DEAL, Britain (AP) 

   Prince Philip on Sunday condemned the
``senseless'' killing of 10 Royal Marines musicians in an IRA
bombing, and Britain's defense secretary said he warned all
military bases of the risk of similar attacks.
   Clergyman urged relatives and friends of dead and maimed
musicians to forgive the bombers. ``Only forgiveness breaks the tie
between the hater and the hated,'' the Rev. George Lings told
mourners.
   The prince, husband of Queen Elizabeth II and captain general of
the Royal Marines, visited injured men in the hospital and toured
the severely damaged Royal Marines School of Music in Deal,
southeast Britain.
   ``It will not help the IRA win anything,'' said Philip, who wore
a Royal Marines tie. ``It is senseless. One simply wonders what
sort of mentality can even contemplate such meaningless acts. It is
appalling.''
   He paid tribute to the 12 injured men, five of whom were
critically wounded.
   The prince was accompanied by Viscountess Mountbatten, daughter
of Lord Mountbatten, who was killed by an IRA bomb on his boat in
1979. Mountbatten was India's last viceroy and a cousin of the
queen.
   British military installations are a frequent target of the
Irish Republican Army in its campaign to end British rule in
Northern Ireland and unite the predominantly Protestant province
with the Roman Catholic Republic of Ireland.
   Defense Secretary Tom King said Sunday he has issued an alert to
all military installations to prevent other attacks. He would not
give details.
   ``The perpetrators of the latest outrage are at large and there
is a risk of other attacks,'' King said. ``That is why we are
taking a number of other steps.''
   King defended the use of private security firms hired to guard
the Deal school and 29 other ``low-risk'' military installations in
Britain. Local residents and grieving relatives have said security
was lax and should be turned back to the marines. King said the
private firms will remain.
   ``It is important to remember that what we need in these cases
are eyes and ears and observation,'' King said on British
Broadcasting Corp. radio.
   ``Private security guards can be a very useful additional
assistance. They also help to reduce the amount of time soldiers
have to spend on what is not the most enjoyable part of their
activity.''
   At church services throughout the small port, clergymen urged
mourners to pray for and forgive the bombers.
   The Rev. Charles Howard, a Royal Navy chaplain, asked the
300-member congregation inside the barracks, ``if you can find room
in your hearts ... pray for the men who perpetrated this terrible
act, that God will soften their hearts and turn them from their
violent and evil ways.''
   Many cried as Howard read aloud the names of the 10 servicemen
killed during a coffee break between band practices. It was the
worst IRA attack on the British mainland since July 1982.
   At nearby St. George's Church, formerly the Royal Marines'
church, Lings said, ``no one says forgiveness is easy; no one says
the terrorist deserves forgiveness.
   ``But ... forgive them, they not what they do.''



 AP890925-0124 
AP-NR-09-25-89 1627EDT
r i AM-Britain-Blast     09-25 0360
AM-Britain-Blast,0371
Prime Minister Condemns IRA for Music School Explosion
DEAL, England (AP) 

   Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher said
Monday the Irish Republican Army members who blew up the Royal
Marines School of Music and killed 10 bandsmen last week are
``monsters'' who will be found and punished.
   ``The young men whom we lost were murdered by common murderers
who must be found and brought to justice and put behind bars for a
very long time,'' she said following a tour of the school's wrecked
barracks in Deal, southeast England.
   ``We lost 10 remarkable musicians, not fighting men, just
because some people try to bomb others out of their democratic
views,'' she said. ``They are very evil people, absolute monsters.''
   Gerry Adams, president of Sinn Fein, the legal political arm of
the IRA, issued a statement disputing Mrs. Thatcher's remarks,
saying ``she knows in her heart of hearts the real nature of the
conflict, its cause and the remedy.''
   The IRA is fighting to end British rule in Northern Ireland and
unite the predominantly Protestant province with the Roman Catholic
Republic of Ireland.
   ``We want an end to all violent deaths arising out of the
present relationship between our two countries,'' Adams said. ``We
want a new peaceful relationship based on an acceptance and respect
for our rights as a sovereign nation.''
   After visiting some of the 11 injured bandsmen still in the
hospital, Mrs. Thatcher pledged: ``The hunt for the bombers will be
pursued with all possible speed, vigor and dedication.''
   Raymond Kendall, the secretary-general of the international
police organization Interpol, pledged the organization's full
support in the hunt for those who blew up the school.
   ``I hope we will have a part to play in finding them,'' said
Kendall after opening the International Police Exhibition and
Conference in London.
   ``They are criminals of the worst sort and should be dealt with
as such.''
   Before landing in Deal, Mrs. Thatcher's helicopter flew over the
rubble that had been the band's recreation center.
   The IRA claimed responsibility for the explosion, and police
said they are looking for three men with Irish accents who rented a
house overlooking the barracks.



 LA092389-0092 
 111274 


September 23, 1989, Saturday, Home Edition 




Part 1; Page 1; Column 3; Foreign Desk 




980 words 




10 KILLED, 22 HURT BY IRA BOMB AT ENGLAND BARRACKS 




By DAN FISHER, Times Staff Writer 




LONDON 




The Irish Republican Army claimed responsibility for a huge explosion Friday 
that reduced a three-story military barracks on the southeast coast of England 
to rubble, killing 10 people and injuring 22, eight seriously. It would be one 
of the outlawed IRA's deadliest attacks on the main British island. 


Nine marine musicians and one civilian died in the blast, which also damaged 
dozens of nearby homes and could be heard two miles away. The musicians were 
between the ages of 16 and 20 as are most of the recruits in the school. 


A police spokesman said forensic experts are still trying to determine with 
certainty that the explosion was the result of a bomb. But he said the 
characteristics of the blast and a statement claiming responsibility appeared 
to confirm that it was the work of the IRA. 


Security sources said they believe that at least two IRA "active service" 
units, each composed of four or five members, are operating in Britain and 
continental Europe. 


One member, known as the "Jackal" after the assassin in the Frederick Forsyth 
novel "The Day of the Jackal," has been eluding the authorities for two years. 
He has been identified as Patrick Sheehy and has been linked to the IRA's last 
successful mainland bombing attack -- on an army barracks at Mill Hill in 
August, 1988. One soldier was killed in that incident. 


Sheehy and another wanted Irishman, John Conaghty, were linked to an IRA bomb 
factory in North London that the police stumbled upon last December while in 
pursuit of a car thief. A search turned up automatic and semiautomatic weapons, 
ammunition, 150 pounds of Semtex high explosive and a "hit list" of 100 British 
political figures and other officials headed by Prime Minister Margaret 
Thatcher. 


Friday's explosion occurred about 8:30 a.m. in a lounge at the Royal Marines 
School of Music near Deal, on the English Channel in the county of Kent. At the 
school are about 250 recruits who receive military and musical training before 
joining Royal Marines bands. 


The roof of the three-story barracks collapsed, trapping victims beneath the 
rubble. Firefighters used thermal cameras and dogs to search the debris for 
victims and survivors. Heavy lifting gear was brought to the scene from a 
nearby site where a tunnel is being built beneath the English Channel. 


Rescuers shouted for quiet as they used high-technology listening equipment in 
an effort to trace the sound of faint heartbeats. 


"I looked up from the sink and I just saw the whole building explode," Heather 
Hackett, a 26-year-old Deal housewife, told the British Press Assn. She said 
she told her children to run for cover, but as they did, her kitchen window 
shattered. 


"The whole window was blown across the kitchen," Hackett recalled. Her 
2-year-old son, Joshua, was hit by a shard that embedded itself in his back but 
caused no serious injury. 


"I just screamed and ran out of the room," she said. "The bang was so loud I 
thought the whole house was coming in." 




'Appalling Outrage' 


Defense Secretary Tom King visited the scene and called the bombing "an 
appalling outrage committed against unarmed bandsmen -- people who worked for 
charity, who have given great enjoyment to millions right across the country, 
right across the world. 


"The real evil of these murders is that the people who commit them, the 
'godfathers' who send them to commit them, know that they will actually achieve 
nothing. Terrorism is not going to win. We shall find the people responsible 
for this outrage sooner or later, as we have already found some of those 
responsible for the earlier outrages, and they will be brought to justice." 


The authorities have been on high alert, expecting IRA attacks in connection 
with last month's 20th anniversary of the introduction of British troops into 
Northern Ireland. The republican underground organization opposes British rule 
in the predominantly Protestant province and is fighting to join the mainly 
Roman Catholic south in a united, independent Ireland. 




Visit to Ulster 


But in a statement telephoned to a Dublin news agency, Ireland International, 
Friday's attack was linked to Thatcher's visit last week to units of the 
controversial Ulster Defense Regiment in Northern Ireland. 


The locally recruited, overwhelmingly Protestant Ulster Defense Regiment has 
come under fire in connection with an investigation into the leak of secret 
government lists of suspected IRA members to Protestant assassination squads. 
It is widely hated by the Catholic minority in the province, and the Irish 
government in Dublin has urged Britain to disband the force. 


"Mrs. Thatcher visited Ireland with a message of war at a time when we want 
peace," the statement claiming responsibility for the Deal attack said. "Now in 
turn we have visited the Royal Marines in Kent. But we still want peace, and we 
want the British government to leave our country." 


The statement was signed "P. O'Neill, Irish Republican Publicity Bureau," a 
signature that has appeared on earlier IRA bombing claims. 


Friday's attack was the worst on the mainland since the virtually simultaneous 
bombings of July, 1982, directed at ceremonial military units in London's Hyde 
Park and Regent's Park. Eleven bandsmen and mounted guards were killed in those 
incidents. 


Eight persons were killed by IRA car bombs outside Harrods department store 
here in December, 1983, and 21 were killed and 162 injured in two Birmingham 
public house bombings in the fall of 1974. 


An attempted barracks bombing was averted last February when a sentry came upon 
two intruders who had managed to get inside a military camp in Shropshire. 


There has been a series of bomb and automatic rifle attacks this year on 
British soldiers and their families stationed in West Germany. Earlier this 
month an IRA gunman shot to death an army wife, Heidi Hazell, 25, in her car 
near her home at Dortmund. 




Photo, Rescue workers use earth mover to dig through barracks at Royal Marines 
School of Music in frantic effort to locate bomb victims. Associated Press; 
Map, Barracks Blast Site, AP / Los Angeles Times 




IRISH REPUBLICAN ARMY; BOMBINGS -- ENGLAND; ENGLAND -- ARMED FORCES; TERRORISM 
-- ENGLAND; ENGLAND -- FOREIGN RELATIONS -- NORTHERN IRELAND; NORTHERN IRELAND 
-- REVOLTS 




 AP880314-0110 
AP-NR-03-14-88 1223EST
r i AM-Yugoslavia-McDonalds     03-14 0243
AM-Yugoslavia-McDonalds,0250
First McDonald's to Open in Communist Country
With AM-Gorbachev, Bjt
BELGRADE, Yugoslavia (AP) 

   The communist world gets its first
McDonald's next week, and some people here are wondering whether
its American hamburgers will be as popular as the local fast-food
treat, Pljeskavica.
   The long-awaited opening of the restaurant on one of Belgrade's
main downtown squares will take place March 24, the Yugoslav news
agency Tanjug reported, and it will offer Big Macs, fries and the
other specialities familiar to McDonald's customers in the West.
   The Belgrade media have suggested that the success of the
American restaurant depends on its acceptance by Yugoslavians who
are long accustomed to the hamburger-like Pljeskavica.
   Pljeskavica is made of ground pork and onions, and it is served
on bread and eaten with the hands. It is sold at fast-food
restaurants across the country and costs about a dollar.
   ``In fact, this is a clash between the Big Mac and
Pljeskavica,'' said an official of Genex, Yugoslavia's largest
state-run enterprise that will operate the McDonald's.
   John Onoda, a spokesman at McDonald's Oak Brook, Ill.,
headquarters, said it was the first of the chain's outlets in a
communist country.
   The next East European McDonald's is scheduled to be opened in
Budapest, Hungary, by the end of this year, said Vesna Milosevic,
another Genex official.
   Negotiations have been going on for years for expanding the
fast-food chain to the Soviet Union, but no agreement has been
announced.



 AP880324-0193 
AP-NR-03-24-88 1514EST
u i AM-CommunistMcDonalds Bjt   03-24 0613
AM-Communist McDonalds, Bjt,0630
Police Keep Crowds From Crashing First McDonald's
By DUSAN STOJANOVIC
Associated Press Writer
BELGRADE, Yugoslavia (AP) 

   Communism suffered its first Big Mac
attack Thursday as McDonald's opened a restaurant in Yugoslavia,
and police were called in to keep customers who lined up for hours
from getting too unruly under the golden arches.
   ``I just wanted to taste genuine American hamburgers,'' said
Milica Nikolic, a high school student who waited for three hours to
taste her first Big Mac.
   People curiously examined the renovated restaurant's plush
interior and the back-lit signs depicting the hamburgers, french
fries, milk shakes and other fare more familiar in the West. It
also featured amber-colored tables and floors, pastel-colored
upholstery, modern art paintings and discreet illumination.
   The fast-food outlet, located on a downtown square, had drawn
crowds in recent days, and they began gathering long before it
opened Thursday.
   Police kept watch on the lines of customers snaking around the
block, and they regulated the number who came inside to avoid
overcrowding.
   ``No opening of a restaurant in Belgrade has created such a
sensation as this one today,'' one policeman said.
   ``I think this restaurant has no competition in Belgrade,'' said
Milica Danic, a housewife who treated her son to a cheeseburger.
``It is much cleaner, the service is faster, the interior is nicer
and it is not too expensive.''
   The Belgrade media have suggested that the success of McDonald's
in Yugoslavia depends on its acceptance by citizens long accustomed
to a hamburger-like fast-food dish called the Pljeskavica: ground
pork and onions on a bun.
   ``In fact, this is a clash between the Big Mac and
Pljeskavica,'' said Vesna Milosevic, an official of Genex, a
Yugoslav state-run enterprise that has contracted a joint venture
agreement with McDonald's.
   ``Our aim is not to destroy the Pljeskavica on the Yugoslav
market,'' said Predrag Dostanic, managing director of the
Genex-McDonald's. ``We want to change customs of the local people
used to completly different eating habits.''
   He said that lounging at tables for a long time after a finished
meal will draw a warning. Also, smoking is forbidden and alcohol
will not be served.
   This contrasts sharply with the Balkan and Yugoslav custom of
sitting with a drink in smoke-filled restaurants and chatting with
friends after the meal.
   The Big Mac meal, consisting of a hamburger, soft drink and
french fries costs the equivalent of $2.57, or about as much the
similar meal would cost in numerous Pljeskavica joints around town.
   Sadik Seljami, a waiter in a small Pljeskavica outlet just a few
hundred yards from the McDonald's, suggested that the American
restaurant wants to drive Yugoslav fast-food outlets out of
business.
   ``However, we will not give up the fight even if we have to
lower the prices,'' said Seljami.
   Glen Cook, an executive of the McDonald's Corp., said during the
opening ceremonies, ``We are very excited about the opening of this
restaurant, not only because it is the first one in a communist
country, but also because it is one of the nicest in Europe.''
   McDonald's and Genex contribute $1 million each for the flagship
restaurant. They will also share the profits equally even though it
will be managed entirely by Yugoslavs.
   The restaurant has 350 seats and employs 110 people capable of
serving 2,500 meals per hour. In an effort to keep a high level of
services, the management is entitled to fire any employees who fail
to perform.
   The American corporation plans to open five additional
restaurants Yugoslavia in the next five years. The next East
European McDonald's, and the first in a Soviet bloc country, is to
open next month in Budapest, Hungary.



 AP900131-0200 
AP-NR-01-31-90 2051EST
u i AM-Soviet-McDonald's 2ndLd-Writethru a0764 01-31 0748
AM-Soviet-McDonald's, 2nd Ld-Writethru, a0764,0767
A Bolshoi Mac Attack in Moscow as First McDonald's Opens
Eds: INSERTS graf after 6th `Big Macs' to ADD official exchange
rates. Pickup 7th `Half the...'
LaserPhotos MOSB4,6
By ANN IMSE
Associated Press Writer
MOSCOW (AP) 

   Thousands of queue-hardened Soviets on Wednesday
cheerfully lined up to get a taste of ``gamburgers,''
``chizburgers'' and ``Filay-o-feesh'' sandwiches as McDonald's
opened in the land of Lenin for the first time.
   The world's largest version of the landmark American fast-food
chain rang up 30,000 meals on 27 cash registers, breaking the
opening-day record for McDonald's worldwide, officials said.
   The Soviets, bundled in fur coats and hats, seemed unfazed,
lining up before dawn outside the 700-seat restaurant, the first of
20 planned across the Soviet Union. The crush of customers was so
intense the company stayed open until midnight, two hours later
than planned.
   ``I only waited an hour and I think they served thousands before
me,'' said a happy middle-aged woman who works at an aluminum plant.
   ``And it was only 10 rubles for all this,'' she said. ``I'm
taking it back for the girls at the factory to try.''
   Big Macs were priced at 3.75 rubles and double cheeseburgers at
3 rubles _ about two hours' pay for a starting McDonald's staffer
or the average Soviet, but much cheaper than other private
restaurants that have sprung up recently.
   The official exchange rate is $1.59 per ruble but foreign
visitors can buy rubles for 16 cents each, about what the currency
is worth on the black market.
   Half the day's sales were donated to the Soviet Children's Fund,
which provides medical care and assistance to orphans and
disadvantaged children, Gary Reinblatt, senior vice president of
McDonald's Canada, said from Toronto.
   The restaurant, built by the company in a joint venture with the
city of Moscow that began 14 years ago, brought to 52 the number of
countries where McDonald's operates.
   The previous opening-day record for sales was in Budapest,
company officials said. Besides its restaurants in the United
States, the leading number of McDonald's are in Canada and Japan,
the officials said.
   Soviets got a first-hand look at such alien concepts as
efficiency and fast, friendly service. Normally dour citizens broke
into grins as they caught the infectious cheerful mood from
youthful Soviet staffers hired for their ability to smile and work
hard.
   Accordions played folk songs and women in traditional costumes
danced with cartoon characters, including Mickey Mouse and Baba
Yaga, a witch of Russian fairy tales.
   One Muscovite, accustomed to clerks who snarl if they say
anything at all, asked for a straw and was startled when a smiling
young Soviet woman found him one and popped it straight into his
drink.
   For most customers, it was their first experience with a
hamburger. Sandwiches were served in the familiar bag marked with
the golden arches, but were packed in wrappers bearing Cyrillic
letters, approximating ``gamburger.''
   They tried them one-handed. They picked their sandwiches apart
to examine the contents. One young woman finally squashed her
``Beeg Mak'' to fit her lips around it.
   ``It tasted great!'' a 14-year-old boy said.
   ``It's a lot different from a stolovaya,'' he continued with a
smile, referring to the much cheaper but run-down dirty cafeterias
that slop rice and fat or boiled sausage.
   Under the sign of the golden arches, accented by the Soviet
hammer-and-sickle flag, hundreds lined up for the long-awaited
grand opening at 10 a.m. on Pushkin Square, reaching out excitedly
for McDonald's flags and pins as the hamburger chain's army
fulfilled the Soviet penchant for souvenirs with Western logos.
   Publicity-conscious managers had the staff shout ``Good morning,
America!'' in English and Russian, for an American TV network.
   McDonald's of Canada Chairman George Cohon, the man behind the
deal, said many people were buying multiple orders and the
restaurant served 15,000 to 20,000 people in just the first five
hours of operation.
   The restaurant limited purchases to 10 Big Macs per customer in
hopes of preventing burger-scalping.
   McDonald's built its own factory, including bakery, dairy,
meat-processing plant and even potato storage yard, to provide its
own guaranteed supplies in a country where up to 25 percent of the
harvest rots en route to the consumer.
   One McDonald's associate said the company wound up importing
wooden crates from Finland for storing potatoes because ``when they
went to build crates, they found there was no wood, and no nails.
They found you need a permit to buy nails.''



 AP901008-0136 
AP-NY-10-08-90 2027EDT
r i AM-China-McDonald's     10-08 0499
AM-China-McDonald's,0614
McDonald's Opens First Restaurant in China
LaserPhoto
By WONG SAU-YING
Associated Press Writer
SHENZHEN, China (AP) 

   McDonald's hamburgers, fries and golden
arches came to China on Monday when the fast-food chain opened its
first restaurant in a nation famed for its distinctive cuisine.
   Hundreds of Chinese waited for hours outside the restaurant in
Shenzhen, an economic boom town near Hong Kong, for their first
taste of a McDonald's hamburger, fries or shake.
   ``I travelled for four hours from a village to get here,'' said
Huang Rongti, 70, who has lost most of her teeth because of age.
``You think hamburgers are too challenging for my age?''
   Later, after purchasing her first Big Mac, she inspected it
carefully before taking a bite.
   ``It tastes good, I like it,'' she announced before slowly
eating the rest.
   The opening of a U.S. fast-food restaurant in China, where
cooking has long been considered a culinary art, may seem odd to
gourmets. It is estimated there are more than 5,000 different
Chinese dishes.
   In Canton, 125 miles northwest of Shenzhen, chefs specialize in
some of the more exotic Chinese dishes, such as cat stew, bear
paws, chicken feet and a famed snake dish - ``Dragon and Tiger
Locked in Battle'' - made from three kinds of poisonous snakes
stewed with leopard meat, and garnished with 20 spices, lemon
leaves and chrysanthemum petals.
   However, many Chinese, who earn an average $32 a month, are
still unable to afford fancy meals at restaurants.
   In Shenzhen, a Chinese special economic zone where foreign
investors have built factories, salaries are higher and workers
earn an average of $53 a month.
   At the restaurant, a Big Mac costs $1.14, a bag of fries 48
cents and a shake 74 cents.
   Another U.S. fast food outlet, Kentucky Fried Chicken, opened a
restaurant in Beijing in 1987, and it now has four outlets there.
McDonald's hopes to open a restaurant in Beijing later.
   Although Kentucky Fried Chicken has become popular, the average
Chinese still regards a meal there as a treat, rather than a
convenience, and McDonald's could face the same problems.
   The 500-seat McDonald's restaurant in a three-story building is
operated by McDonald's Restaurant Shenzhen Ltd., a wholly owned
subsidiary of McDonald's Hong Kong. McDonald's Hong Kong is a 50-50
joint venture with McDonald's in the United States.
   It is managed by a Chinese national, Chen Tikang, and his son,
Chen Yin, who is the restaurant manager. The younger Chen returned
recently from a course at McDonald's hamburger university in Oak
Brook, Ill.
   Most of the ingredients used at the restaurant are now imported
from Hong Kong. But McDonald's executives hope eventually to get
their supplies of beef and potatoes from China.
   Daniel Ng, chairman of McDonald's Restaurant Shenzhen Ltd., said
it took two years to prepare for the restaurant's opening and his
ambition now is to serve 10 million burgers a year.
   Last month, when McDonald's advertized for 240 staffers for the
restaurant, it received applications from more than 9,000 persons,
including college graduates, officials said.
   ``I feel I have a better job prospect working here, and it pays
better,'' said Henry He, 25, who has a master's degree in garment
and textile. He is an assistant manager at the restaurant.
   A waiter at the restaurant can earn 53 cents an hour.
   A factory worker, who waited several hours before she was able
to purchase her hamburger, said she liked it because of its ``sweet
taste'' - the result of tomato ketchup, which is not commonly used
in traditional Chinese cooking.



FT932-5869
_AN-DFBBWAAOFT
930602


FT  02 JUN 93 / Big Macs rake in the roubles


   By LEYLA BOULTON


   MOSCOW


AS THE value of the rouble plunges and potential foreign investors worry
about a host of obstacles to investing in Russia, Russian officials had
several reasons yesterday to feel thankful for McDonald's hamburgers.
Opening the second McDonald's restaurant in Moscow, along with a 12-storey
office block, Mr George Cohon, head of McDonald's Canada, could well be
described as the Russian authorities' idea of a model investor.
McDonald's proven determination 'to be here for the long term' and to serve
Russians in their own currency as opposed to the dollars charged by most
other foreign joint ventures are just a couple of reasons for Russian
gratitude.
Mr Viktor Khlystun, the agriculture minister, praised the fact that
McDonald's gets most of its supplies from inside Russia after setting up a
Dollars 45m processing plant outside Moscow.
He also thanked McDonald's for providing jobs, a model of western standards
for the country's decrepit service industry, and finally for what he
described as 'the most delicious food'.
But despite the jolly opening ceremony - with Big Macs, musicians playing
the balalaika, and hundreds of yellow balloons forming a giant M - life has
been tough for McDonald's since it opened its first restaurant in Moscow 3
1/2 years ago.
Although the first Moscow restaurant is the busiest McDonald's in the world
the plunging rouble, high inflation and constantly changing tax rules have
been a challenge to McDonald's management, who admitted that they have no
idea of when it could recoup its initial Dollars 50m investment.
'It will depend on how rapidly we can open new restaurants, what happens to
the rouble, what happens to raw materials that we buy. We don't have an
estimate of how long it will take. There are too many variables,' said Mr
Cohon.
Apart from housing the restaurant on the ground floor, the McDonald's office
block is rented out to western companies in an attempt to generate hard
currency alongside the mountains of roubles made from selling hamburgers.


Companies:-

McDonald's Corp.


Countries:-

RUZ  Russia, East Europe.
    USZ  United States of America.


Industries:-

P5812 Eating Places.


Types:-

RES  Facilities.

The Financial Times


London Page 2



 LA020190-0038 
 169832 


February 1, 1990, Thursday, Home Edition 




Part A; Page 1; Column 5; Foreign Desk 




1057 words 




1ST 'BEEG MAK' ATTACK LEAVES MOSCOW AGOG 




By MASHA HAMILTON, TIMES STAFF WRITER 




MOSCOW 




When the doors swung open Wednesday at the first McDonald's restaurant in the 
Soviet Union, thousands of Muscovites poured in to sip "milk cocktails" and 
taste their first "Beeg Mak Gamburgers," picking them apart to marvel at the 
fixin's. 


Some expressed wonder at the speedy service -- "only an hour in line" -- while 
others heralded the event as the first evidence that President Mikhail S. 
Gorbachev's economic reforms are finally filtering down to the average 
Muscovite. 


Although cynics might complain of the steady homogenizing of world cultures, 
the arrival of the fast-food chain here -- 14 years after a Canadian McDonald's 
official broached the idea with Soviet officials at the 1976 Montreal Olympics 
-- was without doubt a major event. 


Most customers seemed thrilled to be part of it, even though some of them gave 
the Big Mac sandwich a mixed review. 


"It tasted very, I would say, unusual," Lubov Sereda, 45, said with a smile. 
"Everything was very soft and mild." 


"But those strawberry milk cocktails, well. . . ," her husband put in, flashing 
a thumbs-up sign. 


"It was very interesting, that gamburger," Zvetlana Generotova, 25, said, 
leaving with a large paper bag filled with take-out food, also a new concept 
here. "I certainly want my family to try it, at least once." 


Russians say "gamburger" because they pronounce Western words that begin with 
"h" as though they begin with "g." 


Another customer, Victor Kunyasev, said: "Well, my wife makes better food. But 
it was nice, a good place to take a break and grab a bite to eat." 


Some reported waiting up to 1 hour and 45 minutes to be served, but most did 
not seem to mind. In honor of the grand opening, a brigade of workers 
distributed McDonald's flags and pins; entertainers performed on the accordion 
and sang folk songs under golden arches adorned with the Soviet hammer and 
sickle. 


The world's largest McDonald's, with 27 cash registers and a seating capacity 
of 900, brings to Moscow not only hamburgers, french fries and shakes (called 
"milk cocktails" here), but also a living lesson in Western-style marketing. 


At training sessions before opening day, cashiers were taught the importance of 
greeting customers cheerfully, of saying "please" and "thank you" -- all of 
which promises something distinctly different from the typically surly service 
at most of Moscow's dingy state cafes. 


"This is very different from anything I've ever done before," cashier Larissa 
Lebedeva said. Lebedeva, 25, who formerly worked as deputy director of a small 
food store, said that "to be this polite and to have everything this clean is 
new for the workers as well as for the customers." 


Sam Yahel, from McDonald's in Atlanta, who helped train the 630 Soviet workers, 
said the Soviet trainees were at a disadvantage because in most other parts of 
the world, new workers had at least eaten at one of the restaurants. 


Most of the Soviet workers had never tasted a Western-style hamburger. They 
practiced cooking using yellow cardboard squares in place of cheese and 
different colored poker chips in place of onions, tomatoes and pickles. 


"The Soviet Union is definitely a different world," Yahel said. "Our food and 
our standards -- it's all new. For example, we had to teach our employees that 
when there were still crumbs on the counter, it needed to be wiped off again." 


While most of the Soviet workers trained for a matter of days, the four Soviet 
managers of the restaurant spent nine months abroad learning their jobs. They 
graduated from the Canadian Institute of Hamburgerology. 


The Moscow McDonald's will be open for 12 hours a day beginning at 10 a.m. and 
will be able, they say, to serve more than 15,000 customers a day. 


On Wednesday, though, it stayed open an extra two hours and served a McDonald's 
record 30,000 meals. The previous record for opening-day transactions was 9,100 
in Budapest, Hungary, and the previous record sales for a single day was 14,000 
in Hong Kong. 


There is a brass plaque near the entrance that announces, "Soviet Rubles Only." 
Virtually every other foreign firm that has come into the Soviet Union in 
recent years accepts only hard currencies, meaning that it caters primarily to 
foreigners. 


The McDonald's prices are high compared to the state restaurants, where a large 
meal seldom costs more than a ruble. The Big Mac costs 3.75 rubles, or about $5 
at the official exchange rate, and dinner out for the family can come to two 
days' wages for the average Soviet worker. 


McDonald's employees are paid 1.50 rubles an hour, with a chance for an 
increase of up to 50 kopecks in three months' time. The staff was chosen from 
25,000 applicants. 


Canadian and American officials who have helped train the Soviet personnel know 
that the allure of working for a Western firm was a drawing factor, but they 
nonetheless expect a 20% turnover rate, twice their normal average. 


McDonald's invested $50 million in setting up the restaurant and a food 
processing plant in a Moscow suburb that turns out everything from meat patties 
to sesame-seed buns. Soviet farmers, who are supplying most of the products, 
have been given special training and disease-resistant seed for potatoes and 
cucumbers. 


The extra effort was necessary to guarantee supplies in a country where as much 
as 25% of the harvest spoils on the way to the consumer. 


Despite all of the planning, some shortages still affect the operation. Coffee 
is not on the menu, for example, because supplies cannot be guaranteed. 


The joint venture agreement between McDonald's of Canada and the Moscow City 
Council calls for 20 restaurants, though there is no timetable or even a 
definite plan for when or where the second McDonald's will open. 


Is there any fear that when the golden arches become as common as the cupolas 
of Russian Orthodox churches, it will be a sign that capitalism is making real 
inroads in the Communist capital? McDonald's officials say it is not a question 
that worries them or their Soviet counterparts. 


"There weren't many ideological discussions during these negotiations," said 
Marc Winer, 43, a native of Nashua, N.H., who is general director of the Moscow 
outlet. "The Soviets understood that the food was going to move very 
efficiently from the field to the mouth. That is more important to them right 
now than almost anything else." 




Photo, COLOR, Crowd gathers for opening of first McDonald's in Soviet Union, 
where some waited an hour for fast food. Agence France-Presse; Photo, Soviet 
police officer, woman and two youngsters chow down at Moscow's giant new 
McDonald's, near City Hall. With seats for 900 and 27 cash registers, it served 
30,000 people on opening day. Associated Press; Reuters; Map, Moscow 
McDonald's, AP / Los Angeles Times 




FAST FOOD INDUSTRY -- USSR; MCDONALD'S RESTAURANTS OF CANADA LTD; CANADA -- 
FOREIGN INVESTMENTS -- USSR; JOINT VENTURES; OCCUPATIONAL TRAINING; USSR -- 
LABOR; CUSTOMER SERVICE; USSR -- CULTURE 




 WSJ880412-0015 
 McDonald's Outlet In Korea to Target New Middle Class 
 Joseph P. Manguno (WSJ Staff) 
 
 FREST MCD 
 RFD 
 SEOUL  

   Two corporate executives sat down in an office here last month to talk business with a bunch of clowns. 

   The subject was no laughing matter, but rather the serious endeavor of finding South Korea's Ronald McDonald. 
Seven years after the U.S. hamburger giant first tried to bring its Big Macs to South Korea, the golden arches were finally going up. 
McAhn Industries Ltd. recently opened the first of what it expects will be a string of burger outlets in Seoul. 
The company is a 50-50 joint venture of McDonald's Corp., Oak Brook, Ill., and an accountant-turned-entrepreneur, Ahn Hyo Young. 

   McDonald's is flourishing in 11 other nations in the region. 
But its entry into South Korea, which has Asia's fastest-growing economy, had been frustrated by its inability to find a suitable partner and to win agreement from Seoul on terms. 

   South Korea may be one of McDonald's most promising foreign markets, business analysts say. 
The country is developing an essential ingredient for the success of a fast-food enterprise: a middle class. 

   Hamburger-related fast-food sales in South Korea totaled $87.5 million last year, a 30% rise from 1986, according to the Ministry of Finance. 
Analysts say this year's rise could be much bigger, helped by a 25% increase in wages in mid-1987 and another big pay increase expected soon. 

   The business is likely to profit from the 1988 Olympic Games in Seoul in September, and from an anticipated post-Olympic economic boom here. 

   However, the competition is heating up, and there is "a good possibility that South Korea already has reached the fast-food saturation point for its current average income bracket," an official for the South Korea Chamber of Commerce and Industry says. 
The competition, besides Wendy's International's 11 shops and six of Burger King, a unit of Pillsbury Co., includes home-grown burger chains. 

   McDonald's strategy is to take things slowly, avoiding extravagances, Mr. Ahn and Awad Sifri, McDonald's marketing director, say. 
"We are starting small," says Mr. Ahn. 
"We're hoping to open three outlets this year and five next year. 
After that, we'd like to open five every year." 

   Equally modest, he says, will be the initial menu: no breakfast, no Chicken McNuggets and no products tailored to national tastes, as offered elsewhere. 

   The venture is rejecting television commercials in favor of a cheaper, more oldfashioned approach: a brief advertising campaign in newspapers, distribution of fliers and word of mouth. 

   Mr. Sifri says the emphasis will be on developing McDonald's image as an affordable place for the emerging middle class, rather than as a familiar name for foreigners in South Korea. 
Attention will be given to attracting children, he adds. 

   Mr. Ahn says McDonald's talked to 16 potential partners before choosing the Harvard-trained accountant in 1984. 
Two years later, McDonald's and Mr. Ahn each put up $1 million in capital and borrowed an additional $4 million to form McAhn. 

   McDonald's struggled with the government over McAhn's royalty payments to the U.S. partner -- the issue was resolved -- and over tight import restrictions on food products. 
The import question "came down to finding a supplier locally who could supply high-quality beef and potatoes at a value," McDonald's said. 

   Even McDonald's golden arches symbol ran into red tape, since the city regulates the size and color of signs. 
"It may be against the law, but we're putting them up anyway," Mr. Ahn says. 




 AP880817-0040 
AP-NR-08-17-88 0409EDT
r p PM-CVN--QuayleFamily     08-17 0577
PM-CVN--Quayle Family,580
Quayle Called A Dedicated Family Man
By DOUG RICHARDSON
Associated Press Writer
NEW ORLEANS (AP) 

   Dan Quayle's sister believes the Indiana
senator won't let his candidacy for vice president hurt the family
life he and his wife, Marilyn, enjoy.
   ``I don't think it will be tough on the family,'' said Martha
Saddler, Quayle's sister, who lives in Huntington, Ind. ``Since
he's been in politics, we all kind of shake our heads at his hectic
schedule and wonder how he does it. But he does it and loves it.''
   The Quayle family and friends were celebrating Tuesday afternoon
after George Bush announced he wants the 41-year-old Indiana
senator to be the Republican nominee for vice president.
   Those who have known the Quayles for years said the senator and
his wife have remained relatively unchanged by their years in
public life.
   Dan and Marilyn Quayle met as law students in Indianapolis,
married while they were still in school and remain close to many of
their friends from that period.
   ``One of the greatest things about him is the job of being a
senator has not changed him a bit,'' said Indianapolis attorney
William R. Neale, treasurer of Quayle's 1986 re-election campaign.
``He's the same nice guy he was in law school.''
   Neale, who grew up with Marilyn Tucker Quayle in Indianapolis,
introduced Dan Quayle to his future wife at a student gathering at
the Indiana University law school in the early 1970s.
   Dan Quayle, who grew up in Huntington, graduated from DePauw
University, a small liberal arts college in Greencastle, Ind.,
before going to work in the Indiana attorney general's office in
1970.
   Daniel F. Evans, also a law school classmate of Dan Quayle, said
he doesn't expect Quayle's national candidacy to change him.
   ``I think his strength is he'll remember who his friends are
even after this,'' said Evans, who was chairman of Quayle's 1986
campaign.
   Friends said the Quayles are devoted to their three children and
prefer quiet nights at home to nights out on the town in Washington.
   ``His family looks like the family both parties are trying to
appeal to,'' said Mitch Daniels, former political chief in the
White House and now president of the Hudson Institute. ``It's a
beautiful family. I think they'll be a real asset.''
   The couple, who married in 1972, have a 14-year-old son, Tucker;
a 12-year-old son, Benjamin; and a 9-year-old daughter, Corinne.
   When they campaign in Indiana, the Quayles often tour in two
groups _ the boys riding in parades with Marilyn Quayle and Corinne
and her father visiting county fairs.
   ``The kids are nonchalant, normal kids,'' said Mrs. Saddler.
``They take it in stride and play.''
   In an interview with Indiana reporters Monday, the Quayles said
they had worried during the vice presidential speculation about the
family's loss of privacy during a national campaign.
   ``The total lack of privacy is going to be the biggest minus,''
said Mrs. Quayle, 39.
   Quayle said he had questioned each of his children about whether
he should accept the vice presidential spot if Bush offered it.
   Tucker was fascinated by the idea, Quayle said. Benjamin was
ambiguous but he thought Secret Service agents might be able to
help him on tests at school, Mrs. Quayle said.
   Corinne didn't like the prospect of having her father spend more
time away from home, Quayle said.
   ``She told me, `Daddy, I really hope George Bush picks Bob
Dole,''' said Quayle.



 AP880818-0023 
AP-NR-08-18-88 0355EDT
r p PM-CVN--QuayletheLegend     08-18 0452
PM-CVN--Quayle the Legend,440
Republicans Quickly Elevate Quayle Into The American Pantheon
By HARRY F. ROSENTHAL
Associated Press Writer
NEW ORLEANS (AP) 

   Dan Quayle has not yet been nominated for
vice president and already Republicans are comparing him to Thomas
Jefferson and John F. Kennedy.
   Sen. John Warner of Virginia, who served with Quayle on a Senate
subcommittee, told an audience that whenever he heard the Indiana
senator speak, ``I'd say, `there stands the next Thomas
Jefferson.'''
   And, added Warner, ``he does have the same fire in his belly as
our great forefather Thomas Jefferson of Virginia.''
   Former president Gerald Ford made the comparison with Kennedy, a
Democrat.
   ``In 1960, the American people voted for John F. Kennedy for
president and he was the relatively same age as Dan Quayle,'' said
Ford. ``John Kennedy had been in the House and Senate 14 years
before he was elected president and Dan Quayle's had 12 years.''
   What Quayle thinks of those references isn't known. But he
doesn't like it when people say he looks like movie idol Robert
Redford.
   Whether, indeed, he looks like Redford seems to be in the eye of
the beholder. In the parlance of politics, it's an issue. They are
both male. They are both blond.
   The so-called resemblance became a point of contention in the
1980 Senate race and Redford took umbrage. The actor, who once
played the role of a presidential office seeker in ``The
Candidate'' sent Quayle a telegram telling him to stop the
look-alike references in his congressional campaign literature.
   Quayle said the news media had made the comparison, not he, and
after he was elected sent Redford an autographed picture of himself.
   And this week, he told reporters he considered the so-called
Redford look ``a stigma.'' He wasn't asked how he felt about being
painted as another Jefferson or Kennedy.
   Meanwhile, fellow senators were trying to publicize Quayle who,
at 41, hasn't had a chance to become a legend. He is a Republican
vice presidential candidate who is not, as Spiro Agnew once said of
himself, a household word.
   To help him get known, eight fellow senators Wednesday took
turns telling reporters how much they liked him.
   ``We know him well,'' said Strom Thurmond, R-S.C.
   ``He's attractive because of his looks, he's attractive because
of his enthusiasm,'' said Sen. John McCain, R-Ariz.
   ``I think Dan Quayle, although he's 41 years of age, he's going
to send a message to the American people that the Republican Party
respects young people who achieve,'' said Sen. Pete Domenici, R-N.M.
   Oh, yes, he's also rich, but the senators said that should not
hold him back.
   ``Let's not start this business of who's wealthy,'' Sen. Alfonse
D'Amato, R-N.Y.



 AP880818-0226 
AP-NR-08-18-88 2113EDT
u p BC-CVN--DoleText     08-18 0516
BC-CVN--Dole Text,530
NEW ORLEANS (AP) 

   Here is a transcript of the speech by Sen.
Bob Dole of Kansas nominating Sen. Dan Quayle of Indiana for vice
president at the Republican National Convention on Thursday night.
   Thank you. Thank you.
   Mr. Chairman, four of my congressional colleagues and I are here
for the purpose of nominating the next vice president of the United
States.
   We are here to nominate one of the bright young lights in the
Republican Party, a man I am proud to say is my colleague, the
junior senator from Indiana, Dan Quayle.
   You know, senators get a lot of mail. Party leaders more than
most. And almost every one of these letters asks for help with some
problem.
   Well, three years ago, I received a handwritten plea from a
6-year-old girl who after several days of long, long Senate
sessions had a very special problem.
   She wrote, and I quote: ``I have my second-grade play tonight.
Please make sure my daddy can come home and watch me.''
   I knew Corinne Quayle was from a political family because she
invited me to come along, too.
   Corinne and her brothers, Tucker and Benjamin, and their mother,
Marilyn, share Dan Quayle with the people of Indiana and the United
States Senate.
   Dan Quayle is a dedicated public servant and a devoted family
man.
   And whenever I needed him, whenever I needed him, Dan was there
_ ready and willing to make the tough choices, to cast the tough
votes, to transform President Reagan's vision of America into the
law of the land.
   Whether it was the budget or defense, tax reform or the INF
treaty, Dan Quayle was there, a forceful advocate, and a staunch
supporter of the Reagan revolution. And now he is ready to carry
that revolution forward.
   And believe me he is ready, and just let the Democrats try to
use experience as a measuring stick in this campaign. Just let them
try.
   Now, I don't mean to suggest their presidential candidate lacks
experience. He's got plenty of experience, plenty of experience _
experience in raising taxes again and again, experience in vetoing
the pledge of allegiance in public schools, experience in
increasing spending year after year after year in Massachusetts.
   And I just don't believe the American people want that kind of
experience in the White House.
   It sounds like a Dukak-eyed idea to me.
   But Dan Quayle's got experience, too. He's already spent 12
years as a congressman and a senator, tackling the vital national
and international issues that affect the lives of all Americans and
the future of our country.
   That is 12 more years of national experience than Michael
Dukakis _ and he is running for president.
   As I said at the start, Dan Quayle is a man I know and trust. I
am honored to nominate him for vice president, Mr. Chairman.
   And for the purpose of debate only, I yield the balance of my
time to the outstanding, distinguished senior from Indiana, my good
friend, Sen. Dick Lugar.

End Dole Text _ 1 Take


 AP880819-0023 
AP-NR-08-19-88 0247EDT
r p PM-CVN--Quayle Bjt   08-19 0588
PM-CVN--Quayle, Bjt,560
Quayle's Triumph Quickly Tarnished
By EILEEN PUTMAN
Associated Press Writer
NEW ORLEANS (AP) 

   Dan Quayle's vice presidential nomination was
supposed to be a triumph for the precocious young Indiana senator,
but the dream faded overnight.
   Bush's surprise choice for his running mate was supposed to
ignite a campaign that has seemed at times to suffer from lack of
inspiration, but he quickly encountered questions over his military
record and suggestions he could best serve the Republicans by
withdrawing from the ticket.
   Though he found himself in danger of fizzling Thursday, Quayle
managed to stir the convention hall with his upbeat speech about
family, generations and the rosy future he foresaw under a Bush
administration.
   ``Let's go on to victory!'' Quayle exhorted, as the crowd
erupted in cheers.
   The 41-year-old nominee delivered the speech with calm
self-assurance, sticking close to his text and avoiding his
penchant for extemporaneous remarks _ perhaps another result of the
unanticipated controversy.
   Bush, who followed his running mate to the podium, said he was
``proud to have Dan Quayle at my side.'' The two will stress the
unity of their ticket as they campaign together this weekend
through Indiana, Ohio and Illinois.
   But beyond the optimistic words was an unsettling undercurrent
that threatened Quayle's candidacy just as it was launched.
   Retired Maj. Gen. Wendell C. Phillippi _ who worked for Quayle's
grandfather, Eugene C. Pulliam, as managing editor of The
Indianapolis News _ said he contacted the National Guard on behalf
of Quayle when the young man applied in 1969 and ``recommended him
very highly,'' the News reported.
   Quayle, a hardliner on defense matters, has said he sought guard
duty so he could attend law school. A Bush aide said the matter was
discussed with the Indiana senator during the process that led to
his selection for the Bush ticket, and Quayle had denied that he
used influence to gain admittance to the Guard.
   Bush aides said no thought had been given to dropping Quayle
from the ticket, as some Republicans suggested. Quayle was tense
and refused to answer reporters' questions about the topic during a
brief walk-through at the convention hall.
   It was a daunting change for the senator, whose youthful vigor,
rapid political rise, striking good looks and wealth have been
compared to those of John F. Kennedy.
   Quayle alluded to the National Guard issue during his speech,
saying he was proud of the six years he served. He also addressed
his relative anonymity: ``Many this week have asked, `Who is Dan
Quayle?' The people of Indiana know me and now the nation will.''
   Those who addressed the convention on his behalf also pulled out
their ammunition. Sen. Bob Dole of Kansas, who placed Quayle's name
in nomination, stressed his campaign skills and sought to deflect
concerns that he lacked experience for the job.
   ``He's already spent 12 years as a congressman and senator. ...
That is 12 more years of national experience than Michael Dukakis,
and he is running for president,'' Dole said.
   Sen. Alan Simpson of Wyoming, one of those who seconded the
nomination, said Quayle would ``bring vim, vigor and vitality'' to
the party and would bring ``sparks and voltage to this campaign.''
   Whether Quayle can overcome his difficult start on the national
ticket remains to be seen. Others, notably Democratic vice
presidential nominee Geraldine Ferraro in 1984, found they could
not.
   But Quayle, ever upbeat, was determined Thursday night not to be
daunted by the prospect. ``Miracles do happen,'' he told his party.



 AP880826-0226 
AP-NR-08-26-88 2049EDT
u p AM-Quayle-Resume 2ndLd-Writethru a0678 08-26 0586
AM-Quayle-Resume, 2nd Ld-Writethru, a0678,560
Quayle's Biography Inflates State Job; Quayle Concedes Error
Eds: INSERTS 1 graf after 14th graf pvs, bgng: ``Theodore Sendak
...'' to UPDATE with statement from former assistant attorney
general.
By ROBERT DVORCHAK
AP National Writer
INDIANAPOLIS (AP) 

   Republican vice presidential candidate Dan
Quayle's official resume says he was the Indiana Consumer
Protection Division's chief investigator a year before the unit was
created, state records show.
   The law creating the unit passed April 14, 1971, and took effect
July 1. Officials said Quayle served as chief investigator from
July until mid-September, when he became administrative assistant
to then-Gov. Edgar D. Whitcomb.
   Quayle's Senate biography, which his campaign is using as his
official background, says he was chief investigator of the unit in
the Attorney General's office from 1970 to 1971.
   ``He was assigned to our section in the spring of 1971,'' said
Robert Smith, the unit's first director and now an attorney in
Indianapolis.
   ``He was in fact the chief investigator. He helped get the unit
set up. (But) it would not have been before 1971,'' Smith said
Friday in a telephone interview. ``We formally began operations
July 1.''
   Quayle conceded Friday that the resume entry was ``inaccurate''
and said his staff had written the document.
   ``If it indicated that, that is inaccurate. I didn't hold that
job for two years,'' Quayle told reporters aboard his campaign
plane.
   Earlier, however, Quayle spokesman David Prosperi called the
revelation of the error by The Plain Dealer of Cleveland ``a cheap
shot.''
   Quayle was hired as an entry-level research assistant by the
state Attorney General's office in 1970 after he returned from six
months of basic and advanced training for the Indiana National
Guard.
   Quayle, a 1969 graduate of DePauw University, was attending
Indiana University Law School at the time.
   M. Stanton Evans, then an editor with the Indianapolis News,
helped arrange his job interview with the state. Evans worked for
Eugene C. Pulliam, Quayle's grandfather and publisher of the News.
   ``At no point in any of this did Dan Quayle ask any favors or
use any influence,'' said Evans, now with the National Journalism
Center in Washington, D.C.
   ``He wouldn't have been hired as a chief investigator. He was
hired in an entry-level job and was promoted to a whole bunch of
jobs on his merits. It's a nothing story,'' Evans said.
   Theodore Sendak, the Attorney General at the time, recently had
surgery and is unable to comment, according to his son, Timothy
Sendak.
   Patricia Gifford, a Marion Superior Court judge who was then an
assistant attorney general, said Friday that prior to the
establishment of the Consumer Protection Division, ``all complaints
and inquiries were handled by me. The legal assistant assigned to
me and utilized as my chief investigator was Dan Quayle.'' Her
statement was released by the Quayle campaign.
   The Consumer Protection Division was created by the state
legislature to resolve complaints over defective products, false
claims in ads, faulty speedometer readings and mail-order fraud.
   In 1980, Quayle referred to himself as a ``Vietnam-era veteran''
in campaign literature when he was running against three-term
incumbent Birch Bayh in a Senate race.
   Quayle, who enlisted in the Indiana National Guard, dropped the
reference after objections by some Vietnam combat veterans.
   In that same election, which he won, Quayle said he was ``on
active duty for several periods during his tenure'' in the Guard.
The statement referred to periods when Quayle was in basic training
and 15 days of camp each summer.



 AP881114-0006 
AP-NR-11-14-88 0127EST
r w PM-QuayleAsVeep Bjt   11-14 0979
PM-Quayle As Veep, Bjt,970
Quayle Likely To Be Odd Man Out In Bush White House, Pundits Say
By EILEEN PUTMAN
Associated Press Writer
WASHINGTON (AP) 

   Dan Quayle is likely to be a ``man on the
outside'' in George Bush's White House following a vice presidential
candidacy that began in a furor but settled into obscurity, experts
say.
   Encumbered by his image as a political novice who needed a bevy
of professional handlers to survive early campaign controversies,
Quayle enters a Bush administration in which he has few intimates or
allies.
   Relegated in the campaign to small towns and safe GOP areas,
Quayle as vice president is likely to be given a traditional
ceremonial role _ going to political gatherings and state funerals _
rather than the advisory role that Walter Mondale and even Bush had,
some scholars feel.
   ``Dan Quayle is going to set the vice presidency back about a
decade or more. One thing that political scientists have been
talking about is just how much the vice presidency has grown. ...
With Quayle, it's just going to retreat to the old days of politics
and funerals,'' said Ryan Barilleaux, a professor of political
science at Miami University in Oxford, Ohio, who studies the
American presidency.
   Bush rarely mentioned his 41-year-old running mate during the
campaign. When asked, Bush employed the stock lines that Quayle
would ``make an outstanding vice president'' and had been ``tempered
by steel'' as he weathered the early furor over his military
service, academic record and personal life.
   The president-elect told reporters Quayle would have access to
the same papers, information and intelligence that is available to
the president. But he would go no further in describing what
assignments he would give Quayle.
   Quayle says Bush has talked to him about heading a space council,
and that he assumes he'll have a role in the administration's
anti-drug efforts. ``I will be a very close adviser to the
president,'' Quayle said.
   But that's not the way everyone sees it.
   Both Bush and Mondale came to their vice presidential campaigns
with substantial reputations and were able to place key staffers in
important positions in the respective presidential campaigns,
Barilleaux notes.
   ``Dan Quayle has contributed nothing in the way of staff to the
Bush campaign. He doesn't have his own big reputation on Capitol
Hill. ... Dan Quayle has no friends in a Bush White House except
George Bush,'' Barilleaux says.
   ``They're going to give him a lot of window dressing, a space
council, drug task force, but he's going to be a man on the outside
... not a man who's going to be consulted in a crisis, except on a
pro forma basis.''
   But Eddie Mahe Jr., a GOP consultant who worked with the Bush
campaign, says Bush is likely to give Quayle a more active role in
the administration than he had in the campaign.
   ``Vindication demands that. Both of them will want to prove how
right the decision was,'' Mahe says.
   Democrats portrayed Quayle during the campaign as a lightweight,
a man with little or no legislative accomplishments, untested and
unqualified to be a heartbeat away from the presidency. Even some
members of Quayle's own party were dismayed at Bush's choice.
   Quayle didn't help his case by making a number of celebrated
gaffes during the campaign, perhaps the worst being his garbled
explanation of the Holocaust and his declaration, ``I didn't live in
this century.''
   Norman Ornstein, of the American Enterprise Institute, says
Quayle, while ``not the world's leading intellectual,'' is not ``a
complete dummy.'' He was simply thrust into a situation for which he
was unprepared, Ornstein says.
   ``I think he's immature. He's not stupid,'' Ornstein says.
   But Quayle comes to the White House with ``a very damaging
stereotype that's developed about him that's widely believed in the
political community and that's believed by a large segment of the
electorate,'' Ornstein says.
   ``That's going to give him a good deal to overcome. It's going to
give him an enormous impetus to prove himself. That's going to be
difficult, given the office.''
   Both Barilleaux and Stephen Hess of the Brookings Institution see
parallels in Quayle's vice presidency and those of Richard Nixon and
Spiro Agnew. The choice of Nixon was viewed as a move by Dwight
Eisenhower to appease the party's right wing, and Agnew was seen as
a political nonentity.
   ``The natural response is to use him (Quayle) sparingly, as Nixon
did with Agnew in 1968,'' Hess says. ``However, Quayle has four
years to prove himself, and I think you're going to see stories in
two years about how much he's learned, how much he's acted
responsibly, how far he's come from the campaign of 1988.''
   Quayle admits the campaign was a learning process. After the
controversies subsided, Quayle declared his independence from his
Bush handlers, saying he would be his own man. He became more
accessible to the media but continued to adhere to the schedule
handed down from Washington and to deliver the party's scripted
message. Soon, he dropped off the front pages.
   And although he occasionally spoke out in frustration at having
little control over his schedule and at ceasing to make national
news, he played the role of loyal No. 2 and even trumpeted his new
anonymity.
   ``We have arrived as being a traditional vice presidential
nominee because we are either on the back pages or either not on the
pages at all. That's what we're supposed to be,'' he told reporters.
   That willingness to be a team player could serve him well in a
Bush White House, Mahe feels, since Bush wants ``a private adviser,
whose experience and opinion he respected ... (who) has never had
another agenda.''
   ``Dan Quayle owes his political life to one man and one man
alone,'' Mahe says. ``You're never going to see Dan Quayle telling
tales out of school.''



 LA111289-0035 
 133531 


November 12, 1989, Sunday, Home Edition 




View; Part E; Page 1; Column 4; View Desk 




879 words 




ROGER SIMON: A STRATEGY THAT BEARS REPEATING 




By ROGER SIMON 




One year after his election, Dan Quayle has achieved all he ever wanted: He has 
become dull. 


His coming-out party last Sunday was a true test of his new ability to not make 
news. He went on "Meet the Press." 


This was no small thing. During his entire campaign for the vice presidency, 
Quayle refused all requests from such national interview shows. He didn't 
appear on "Meet the Press" or "This Week With David Brinkley" or "Face the 
Nation." 


And he didn't do so because back then he was making too much news. His every 
slip, his every gaffe, his every goof was news. 


He was the stuff of nightly TV monologues. "A lot of people feel Quayle is just 
too inexperienced for a do-nothing job," Jay Leno once said. 


That joke was not only funny, but it got to the heart of a strange phenomenon: 
Americans didn't give a damn about the vice presidency (Mike Dukakis tried to 
make Quayle a major issue and failed), but some also felt that Quayle wasn't 
qualified for a job that had no qualifications. 


So when Quayle got to Washington, he got there with one goal: Support the 
President and make himself a very small target. Stay out of the headlines and 
give no reason for anyone to dump him in 1992. 


"We had asked him on the show a number of times," Christie Basham, senior 
producer of "Meet the Press" told me, "but he always declined. We renewed our 
request and then after saying he would not do the show, he changed his mind and 
said he would. It was the 42nd anniversary of the show and we wanted someone 
above and beyond the usual guest." 


And it says something about Dan Quayle's reputation that he would be considered 
"above and beyond" the usual guest. Normally, a vice president would not be. 
That's because vice presidents don't actually do anything. They don't run 
departments or make policy. They mostly wait for heads of state to expire. As 
George Bush once joked about his duties as vice president: "You die; I fly." 


But Quayle was considered a hot TV guest because he might screw up. He might 
make a mistake or say something outrageous or disagree with the President. 


None of this happened. The show was uneventful. Quayle answered all the 
questions put to him and he made little if any news. Some major newspapers 
didn't even bother to do a story the next day. 


It was everything Quayle had hoped for. 


I asked David Beckwith, his spokesman, why Quayle had waited so long to go on a 
major interview show. 


"Well, he wanted to concentrate on the more important part of the job," 
Beckwith said. "He wanted to solidify his relationship with the President and 
learn the inner workings of the administration." 


So why go on now? 


"It seemed like a particularly opportune week," Beckwith said. George Bush and 
Mikhail Gorbachev had announced a summit. Central America was back in the news. 
And, oh yeah, Bush had said Dan Quayle would be on the ticket in 1992. 


"And Marlin (Fitzwater, Bush's spokesman) called and just suggested we do the 
show," Beckwith said. 


The selection of Dan Quayle had been Bush's first major (and some would say 
only) decision of his presidential campaign. He had input from a number of 
people, but Quayle was George Bush's choice. 


Many thought it was a terrible choice, but there is nothing like a victory to 
give everything a rosy glow. And Bush's announcement that Quayle would be his 
running mate again was Bush's way of saying: "I didn't screw up the first time. 
I made a decision and it was the right decision and just to show you how right 
it was, I am making it again." 


And now was the time for Quayle to go on "Meet the Press" and show everybody 
just how right George Bush had been. 


I asked Beckwith if Quayle had been pleased by how the show had gone. 


"He was especially pleased with the seriousness of the questions," Beckwith 
said. "A lot of the time, you never know what you're going to get into. 
Sometimes the questions can be not particularly serious." 


A typical example of a "non-serious" question often put to Dan Quayle is: "Why 
does everyone say your wife is smarter than you?" 


But Quayle got no questions like that last week. I asked Christie Basham of 
"Meet the Press" if Quayle had asked in advance who the questioners would be. 
"Yes," Basham said, "but almost all the guests do." 


Quayle's questioners were David Broder of the Washington Post and Elizabeth 
Drew of the New Yorker, both of whom stuck to serious questions. (If Quayle had 
been told the questioners were going to be Hunter Thompson and Jimmy Breslin, I 
have a feeling Quayle might have come down with laryngitis.) 


After the show, Fitzwater called Quayle to express his, and presumably the 
President's, pleasure at how Quayle had handled himself. 


Quayle had said very little and he had said it very well. 


"The very limitations of a vice president's role don't make him an ideal 
guest," Beckwith admitted. "Almost by job description, a vice president is not 
permitted to make serious news." 


And Quayle knows his future is in sticking to that. During the 1988 campaign, I 
interviewed Quayle and I came away with one overwhelming impression: Dan Quayle 
would run for President in 1996. 


And he will do so, I believe, by being a vice president who keeps his head 
down, his nose clean and his life dull. 


After all, it worked for George Bush. 




Column 




 SJMN91-06140099 
 06140099 
  Photos (2); PHOTO: David Schenkel, who coordinated the Premiere Dan Quayle
Memorabilia Exhibit in Huntington, Ind., holds a sweat shirt the vice
president wore to play basketball as a boy.; PHOTO: New York Times; New York
Times; Marj Hiner of Huntington, Ind., and her mom, Dottie Watson, tote a
cardboard Quayle  
  US; VICE-PRESIDENT; CITY; INDIANA; REACTION  
  PEOPLE in this picture-postcard town of Victorian houses and clean streets
don't care what Jay Leno or the polls or the Democrats or disgruntled
Republicans have been saying about Dan Quayle.;    Despite the fact that
President Bush's health problems have made the vice president a national
preoccupation, to people here he's just Danny Quayle from Polk Street -- a
really nice guy from a really nice family that runs the local newspaper.  
  Living  
  QUAYLE'S HOMETOWN FLUSHED WITH PRIDE  
  Cover Story  
     He is the most important person ever to come out of this town, and even as
the world considers his fitness for the presidency, Huntington is celebrating
his life in what is ambitiously being billed as the Premiere Dan Quayle
Memorabilia Exhibit.;    To those who say Quayle does not merit his own
exhibition, Quayle devotees say with a mixture of defiance and dignity that he
is, after all, the vice president of the United States.;    "We're preserving
history," says David Schenkel, the exhibition coordinator. "A century from now
someone may want to do a dissertation on him.";    If so, Huntington will be
ready.;    Relatives, former classmates and longtime neighbors of Quayle have
donated yearbooks, report cards, poems, letters, his Little League uniform, a
coffee cup he drank from, a chair he once stood on during the 1988
presidential campaign and just about anything else he ever touched, wrote,
signed or posed for.;    The vice president's mother, Corinne, donated a lock
of his baby hair. The 1972 Indianapolis 500 queen produced a picture of
Quayle, then an aide to Indiana Gov. Edgar Whitcomb, accompanying her to the
race. And a former housekeeper turned in a 20-year-old piece of carpeting she
saved from one of Quayle's floors.;    The exhibition, which runs through May
20, was put together by the Dan Quayle Commemorative Foundation, a sort of
fan-club-turned-archive devoted to documenting the life and times of the
nation's 44th and, they say, least-understood vice president.;    "He has
taken such a bad rap," said Schenkel, a foundation board member. "If people
knew him, they'd see he's a regular person. If they had a chance to sit down
with Dan as a neighbor, they would see the extremely good values in the man.";
   These are the faithful, who have long since stopped expecting "good press"
on their man. Instead they measure news reports on him by their relative
negativity, describing the best coverage as "more upbeat" or "halfway
decent.";    They defend the relatively young age of Quayle, who turned 44 in
February ("All he needs is a little seasoning"); his limited experience ("Look
at what they said about Truman -- he was a haberdasher"), and his passion for
golf ("He has to have some form of relaxation"). But they are careful not to
stretch the superlatives. The description "nice" comes up a lot.;    "He's not
the fool that the talk show hosts think he is," says Dottie Watson, president
of the Republican Women of Huntington County. "He's a very nice person, a
capable person. Everybody I know says he can do it.";    That is not to say
some people don't have some friendly advice for Quayle. "If he would slow
down, talk an octave lower and think about what he's saying, I don't think
people would take him the way they do," said Jean Anne Drabenstot, the owner
of Nick's Kitchen, Quayle's favorite restaurant.;    Hayden Schenkel, chairman
of the Huntington County Democratic Party and a distant cousin of David
Schenkel, says, "Some people would shudder and shiver if he accidentally
became president of the United States. Most of the Democrats and even some of
the Republicans would say they're tickled to death to have him as vice
president, and they're 100 percent behind him. But in all due respect, we sure
hope nothing happens to President Bush.";    Quayle has declined an invitation
to attend the tribute, citing a busy schedule. Nonetheless, most of
Huntington's 17,000 residents have rallied around their native son for the
exhibition, which tracks his life from infancy through law school, from the
Senate to the vice presidency.;    The free exhibition has turned a gray room
in the town's public library into a virtual Dan Quayle museum. The display
patches together pieces of a life that until the last decade was strikingly
ordinary.;    There is Dan Quayle and his brother Chris riding horseback and
wearing cowboy hats, or sitting in front of the fireplace in their pajamas at
Christmas. There is Dan Quayle with his Vacation Bible School class, Dan
Quayle with the high school golf team, Dan Quayle at 5 or 6 years of age with
Sharon McEachern when they were named king and queen of the swim festival at
the Fort Wayne Country Club. It is all very 50s, very Middle American, almost
surreal in its innocence.;    There are windows into the workings of the
Quayle family, too. For example, his father, James, signed the report cards
when Dan brought home poor grades, and his mother signed when he brought home
good ones.;    And there are letters and poems that he wrote, which only go to
show that one does not have to be a Yeats to make it in politics. Dan wrote
this rather thoughtful verse on Nov. 22, 1960, when he was 13 years old:;   
My Dad is very very nice;    But he is not made of sugar and spice.;   
Sometimes he acts as if he has been disturbed;    But at other times he is as
cheerful as a bird.;    The exhibit also includes the 1972 newspaper
announcement of Dan and Marilyn Quayle's wedding, the wooden "Quayle & Quayle"
shingle the couple hung when they opened their law practice here, and assorted
campaign souvenirs, including the official air sickness bag from the 1988
Republican National Convention.;    Ultimately, the foundation wants to build
a repository for the memorabilia. It has already organized a walking tour of
historic Quayle sites, like the white, ranch-style house where he spent his
early days, and Nick's Kitchen, where he likes to order tenderloins, fries and
a milkshake.;    "We want everybody to know he's a winner -- I don't care what
the newspapers say," said Marge Hiner, one of the exhibit organizers. "What a
role model for our children, to know that you can be a normal person, come
from a normal family and become vice president of the United States."  
  ISABEL WILKERSON, New York Times  
  USA  
  Huntington, Ind.  
  Morning Final  
  SJ  
  San Jose Mercury News  
   910519  
  Sunday  
  May  
  1L  
  1991  
  WEST  
  PHOTO  
  CA  
  1,107  
  Sunday May 19, 1991
00140099,SJ1  
  Copyright 1991, San Jose Mercury News  
  0  
  ENG  

